CHAPTER I.

INTRODUCING DAN.


"_Evening Telegram!_ Only one left. Going for two cents, and worth
double the money. Buy one, sir?"

Attracted by the business-like tone of the newsboy, a gentleman paused
as he was ascending the steps of the Astor House, and said, with a
smile:

"You seem to appreciate the _Telegram_, my boy. Any important news this
afternoon?"

"Buy the paper, and you'll see," said the boy, shrewdly.

"I see--you don't care to part with the news for nothing. Well, here are
your two cents."

"Thank you, sir."

Still the gentleman lingered, his eyes fixed upon the keen, pleasant
face of the boy.

"How many papers have you sold to-day, my boy?" he asked.

"Thirty-six, sir."

"Were they all _Telegrams_?"

"No; I sell all the papers. I ain't partial. I'm just as willing to make
money on the _Mail_, or _Commercial_, or _Evening Post_, as the
_Telegram_."

"I see you have an eye to business. How long have you dealt in papers?"

"Three years, sir."

"How old are you?"

"Fifteen."

"What did you do before you sold papers?"

A shadow rested on the boy's bright face.

"I didn't have to work then, sir," he said. "My father was alive, and he
was well off. We lived in a nice house up town, and I went to a private
school. But all at once father failed, and soon afterward he died, and
then everything was changed. I don't like to think about it, sir."

The gentleman's interest was strongly excited.

"It is a sad story," he said. "Is your mother living?"

"Yes, sir. The worst of it is, that I don't make enough to support us
both, and she has to work, too."

"What does she do?"

"She makes vests for a man on Chatham street."

"I hope she is well paid."

"That she is not. He only allows her twenty cents apiece."

"That is a mere pittance. She can't earn much at that rate."

"No, sir; she has to work hard to make one vest a day."

"The man can't have a conscience," said the gentleman, indignantly. "It
is starvation wages."

"So it is, sir, but he pretends that he pays more than the work is
worth. Oh, he's a mean fellow," pursued the boy, his face expressive of
the scorn and disgust which he felt.

"What is your name, my boy?"

"Dan, sir--Dan Mordaunt."

"I hope, Dan, you make more money than your mother does."

"Oh, yes, sir. Sometimes I make a dollar a day, but I don't average
that. I wish I could make enough so that mother wouldn't have to work."

"I see you are a good son. I like to hear you speak in such terms of
your mother."

"If I didn't," said Dan, impetuously, "I should deserve to be kicked.
She's a good mother, sir."

"I have no doubt of it. It must be hard for her to be so reduced after
once living liberally. How happened it that your father failed?"

The boy's pleasant face assumed a stern expression.

"On account of a rascal, sir. His book-keeper ran off, carrying with him
thirty thousand dollars. Father couldn't meet his bills, and so he
failed. It broke his heart, and he didn't live six months after it."

"Have you ever heard of this book-keeper since?"

"No, sir, not a word. I wish I could. I should like to see him dragged
to prison, for he killed my father, and made my mother work for a
living."

"I can't blame you, Dan, for feeling as you do. Besides, it has altered
your prospects."

"I don't care for myself, sir. I can forget that. But I can't forgive
the injury he has done my poor father and mother."

"Have you any idea what became of the defaulter?"

"We think that he went to Europe, just at first, but probably he
returned when he thought all was safe."

"He may have gone out West."

"I shouldn't wonder, sir."

"I live in the West myself--in Chicago."

"That's a lively city, isn't it, sir?"

"We think so out there. Well, my lad, I must go into the hotel now."

"Excuse me for detaining you, sir," said Dan, politely.

"You haven't detained me; you have interested me. I hope to see you
again."

"Thank you, sir."

"Where do you generally stand?"

"Just here, sir. A good many people pass here, and I find it a good
stand."

"Then I shall see you again, as I propose to remain in New York for a
day or two. Shall you have the morning papers?"

"Yes, sir; all of them."

"Then I will patronize you to-morrow morning. Good-day."

"Good-day, sir."

"He's a gentleman," said Dan to himself, emphatically. "It isn't every
one that feels an interest in a poor newsboy. Well, I may as well be
going home. It's lonely for mother staying by herself all day. Let me
see; what shall I take her? Oh, here are some pears. She's very fond of
pears."

Dan inquired the price of pears at a street stand, and finally selected
one for three cents.

"Better take two for five cents," said the fruit merchant.

"I can't afford it," said Dan. "Times are hard, and I have to look after
the pennies. I wouldn't buy any at all if it wasn't for my mother."

"Better take another for yourself," urged the huckster.

Dan shook his head.

"Can't afford it," he said. "I must get along without the luxuries.
Bread and butter is good enough for me."

Looking up, Dan met the glance of a boy who was passing--a tall,
slender, supercilious-looking boy, who turned his head away scornfully
as he met Dan's glance.

"I know him," said Dan to himself. "I ought to know Tom Carver. We used
to sit together at school. But that was when father was rich. He won't
notice me now. Well, I don't want him to," proceeded Dan, coloring
indignantly. "He thinks himself above me, but he needn't. His father
failed, too, but he went on living just the same. People say he cheated
his creditors. My poor father gave up all he had, and sank into
poverty."

This was what passed through Dan's mind. The other boy--Tom Carver--had
recognized Dan, but did not choose to show it.

"I wonder whether Dan Mordaunt expected me to notice him," he said to
himself. "I used to go to school with him, but now that he is a low
newsboy I can't stoop to speak to him. What would my fashionable friends
say?"

Tom Carver twirled his delicate cane and walked on complacently,
feeling no pity for the schoolfellow with whom he used to be so
intimate. He was intensely selfish--a more exceptional thing with boys
than men. It sometimes happens that a boy who passes for good-hearted
changes into a selfish man; but Tom required no change to become that.
His heart was a very small one, and beat only for himself.

Dan walked on, and finally paused before a large tenement-house. He went
in at the main entrance, and ascended two flights of stairs. He opened a
door, and found himself in the presence of the mother whom he so dearly
loved.




CHAPTER II.

DAN AT HOME.


While Dan was strong, sturdy, and the picture of health, his mother was
evidently an invalid. She was pale, thin, and of delicate appearance.
She was sitting in a cane-seated rocking-chair, which Dan had bought
second-hand on one of his flush days at a small place on the Bowery. She
looked up with a glad smile when Dan entered.

"I am so glad to see you, my dear boy," she said.

"Have you been lonely, mother?" asked Dan, kissing her affectionately.

"Yes, Dan, it is lonely sitting here hour after hour without you, but I
have my work to think of."

"I wish you didn't have to work, mother," said Dan. "You are not strong
enough. I ought to earn enough to support us both."

"Don't trouble yourself about that, my dear boy. I should feel more
lonely if I had nothing to do."

"But you work all the time. I don't like to have you do that."

In truth the mother was very tired, and her feeble fingers were cramped
with the stitch, stitch, stitch in endless repetition, but she put on a
cheerful countenance.

"Well, Dan, I'll stop now that you are at home. You want some supper."

"Let me get it, mother."

"No, Dan, it will be a relief to me to stir around a little, as I have
been sitting so long."

"Oh, I nearly forgot, mother--here's a nice pear I bought for you."

"It does look nice," said Mrs. Mordaunt. "I don't feel hungry, but I can
eat that. But where is yours, Dan?"

"Oh, I've eaten mine," answered Dan, hastily.

It was not true, but God will forgive such falsehoods.

"You'd better eat half of this."

"No; I'll be----flummuxed if I do," said Dan, pausing a little for an
unobjectionable word.

Mrs. Mordaunt set the little table for two. On it she spread a neat
cloth, and laid the plain supper--a plate of bread, ditto of butter, and
a few slices of cold meat. Soon the tea was steeped, and mother and son
sat down for the evening meal.

"I say, mother, this is a jolly supper," said Dan. "I get awfully hungry
by supper-time."

"You are a growing boy, Dan. I am glad you have an appetite."

"But you eat next to nothing, mother," said Dan, uneasily.

"I am _not_ a growing boy," said Mrs. Mordaunt, smiling. "I shall relish
my supper to-night on account of the pear you brought me."

"Well, I'm glad I thought of it," said Dan, heartily. "Pears ain't solid
enough for me; I want something hearty to give me strength."

"Of course you do, Dan. You have to work hard."

"I work hard, mother! Why, I have the easiest time going. All I do is to
walk about the streets, or stand in front of the Astor House and ask
people to buy my papers. Oh, by the way, who do you think I saw to-day?"

"Any of our old friends?" asked Mrs. Mordaunt.

"Any of our old friends! I should say not," answered Dan, disdainfully.
"It was Tom Carver."

"Was it he? He used to sit next you in school, didn't he?"

"Yes, for six months. Tom and I were chums."

"Did he say whether his family was well?"

"What are you thinking of, mother? Do you suppose Tom Carver would
notice me, now that I am a poor newsboy?"

"Why shouldn't he?" demanded the mother, her pale face flushing. "Why
shouldn't he notice my boy?"

"Because he doesn't choose to," answered Dan, with a short laugh.
"Didn't you know it was disgraceful to be poor?"

"Thank Heaven, it isn't that!" ejaculated Mrs. Mordaunt.

"Well, it might as well be. Tom thinks me beneath his notice now. You
should have seen him turn his head to the other side as he walked by,
twirling his light cane."

"Did you speak to him, Dan?"

"What do you take me for, mother? Do you think I'd speak to a fellow
that doesn't want to know me?"

"I think you are proud, my boy."

"Well, mother, I guess you're right. I'm too proud to force myself upon
the notice of Tom Carver, or any other purse-proud sneak."

Dan spoke with a tinge of bitterness, and it was evident that he felt
Tom's slight more than he was willing to acknowledge.

"It's the way of the world, Dan," said his mother, sighing. "Not one of
all my friends, or those whom I accounted such, in my prosperous days,
has come to see us, or shown any interest in our fate."

"They can stay away. We can do without them," said Dan, sturdily.

"We must; but it would be pleasant to see some of the old faces," said
his mother, plaintively. "There is no one in this house that is company
for me."

"No, mother; you are an educated and refined lady, and they are poor and
ignorant."

"They are very good people, some of them. There is Mrs. Burke on the
next floor. She was in this afternoon, and asked if she couldn't do
something for me. She thought I looked poorly, she said."

"She's a brick, mother!"

"My dear Dan, you do use such extraordinary language sometimes. You
didn't talk so when we lived on Madison avenue."

"No, mother, but I associate with a different class now. I can't help
catching the phrases I hear all the time. But don't mind, mother; I mean
no harm. I never swear--that is, almost never. I did catch myself at it
the other day, when another newsboy stole half a dozen of my papers."

"Don't forget that you are a gentleman, Dan."

"I won't if I can help it, mother, though I don't believe anybody else
would suspect it. I must take good care not to look into the
looking-glass, or I might be under the impression that I was a
street-boy instead of a gentleman."

"Clothes don't make the gentleman, Dan. I want you to behave and feel
like a gentleman, even if your clothes are poor and patched."

"I understand you, mother, and I shall try to follow your advice. I have
never done any mean thing yet that I can remember, and I don't intend
to."

"I am sure of that, my dear boy."

"Don't be too sure of anything, mother. I have plenty of bad examples
before me."

"But you won't be guided by them?"

"I'll try not."

"Did you succeed well in your sales to-day, Dan?"

"Pretty well. I made ninety-six cents."

"I wish I could earn as much," said Mrs. Mordaunt, sighing. "I can only
earn twenty cents a day."

"You _earn_ as much as I do, mother, but you don't get it. You see,
there's a difference in earning and being paid. Old Gripp is a mean
skinflint. I should like to force one of his twenty-cent vests down his
miserly throat."

"Don't use such violent language, Dan. Perhaps he pays me all he can
afford."

"Perhaps he does, but I wouldn't bet high on it. He is making a fortune
out of those who sew for him. There are some men that have no
conscience. I hope some time you will be free from him."

"I hope so, too, Dan, but I am thankful to earn something. I don't want
all the burden of our maintenance to fall on you."

"Don't call it a burden, mother. There's nothing I enjoy so much as
working for you. Why, it's fun!"

"It can't be fun on rainy, disagreeable days, Dan."

"It wouldn't be fun for you, mother, but you're not a boy."

"I am so sorry that you can't keep on with your education, Dan. You were
getting on so well at school."

It was a thought that had often come to Dan, but he wouldn't own it, for
he did not wish to add to his mother's sadness.

"Oh, well, mother," he said, "something may turn up for us, so we won't
look down in the mouth."

"I have got my bundled work ready, Dan, if you can carry it round to Mr.
Gripp's to-night."

"Yes, mother, I'll carry it. How many vests are there?"

"There are six. That amounts to a dollar and twenty cents. I hope he'll
pay you to-night, for our rent comes due to-morrow."

"So it does!" ejaculated Dan, seriously. "I never thought of it. Shall
we have enough to pay it? You've got my money, you know."

"We shall be a dollar short."

"Even if old Gripp pays for the vests?"

"Yes."

Dan whistled--a whistle of dismay and anxiety, for he well knew that the
landlord was a hard man.




CHAPTER III.

GRIPP'S CLOTHING STORE.


Nathan Gripp's clothing store was located about a quarter of a mile from
the City Hall, on Chatham street. Not many customers from Fifth avenue
owned him as their tailor, and he had no reputation up town. His prices
were undeniably low, though his clothes were dear enough in the end.

His patrons were in general from the rural districts, or city residents
of easy tastes and limited means.

The interior of the store was ill-lighted, and looked like a dark
cavern. But nearly half the stock was displayed at the door, or on the
sidewalk, Mr. Gripp himself, or his leading salesman, standing in the
door-way with keen, black eyes, trying to select from the moving crowds
possible customers.

On the whole Gripp was making money. He sold his clothes cheap, but they
cost him little. He paid the lowest prices for work, and whenever told
that his wages would not keep body and soul together, he simply
remarked:

"That's nothing to me, my good woman. If you don't like the pay, leave
the work for somebody else."

But unfortunately those who worked for Mr. Gripp could not afford to
leave the work for somebody else. Half wages were better than none, and
they patiently kept on wearing out their strength that Nathan might wax
rich, and live in good style up town.

Mr. Gripp himself was standing in the door-way when Dan, with the bundle
of vests under his arm, stopped in front of the store. Mr. Gripp was a
little doubtful whether our hero wished to become a customer, but a
glance at the bundle dispelled his uncertainty, and revealed the nature
of his errand.

"I've brought home half a dozen vests," said Dan.

"Who from?" asked Gripp, abruptly, for he never lavished any of the
suavity, which was a valuable part of his stock in trade, on his work
people.

"Mrs. Mordaunt."

"Take them into the store. Here, Samuel, take the boy's bundle, and see
if the work is well done."

It was on the tip of Dan's tongue to resent the doubt which these words
implied, but he prudently remained silent.

The clerk, a callow youth, with long tow-colored locks, made sleek with
bear's grease, stopped picking his teeth, and motioned to Dan to come
forward.

"Here, young feller," he said, "hand over your bundle."

"There it is, young feller!" retorted Dan.

The clerk surveyed the boy with a look of disapproval in his fishy
eyes.

"No impudence, young feller!" he said.

"Where's the impudence?" demanded Dan. "I don't see it."

"Didn't you call me a young feller?"

"You've called me one twice, but I ain't at all particular. I'd just as
lief call you an old feller," said Dan, affably.

"Look here, young chap, I don't like your manners," said the clerk, with
an irritating consciousness that he was getting the worst of the verbal
encounter.

"I'm sorry for that," answered Dan, "because they're the best I've got."

"Did you make these vests yourself?" asked the salesman, with a feeble
attempt at humor.

"Yes," was Dan's unexpected rejoinder. "That's the way I amuse my
leisure hours."

"Humph!" muttered the tallow-faced young man, "I'll take a look at
them."

He opened the bundle, and examined the vests with an evident desire to
find something wrong.

He couldn't find any defect, but that didn't prevent his saying:

"They ain't over-well made."

"Well, they won't be over-well paid," retorted Dan. "So we're even."

"I don't know if we ought to pay for them at all."

"Honesty is the best policy, young feller," said Dan.

"No more of your impudence!" said the clerk, sharply. "Wait here a
minute till I speak to Mr. Gripp."

He kept Dan before the counter, and approached the proprietor.

"Well, what is it, Samuel?" asked Mr. Gripp, stroking his jet-black
whiskers. "Are the vests all right?"

"Pretty well, sir, but the boy is impudent."

"Ha! how is that?"

"He keeps calling me 'young feller.'"

"Anything more?"

"He don't seem to have any respect for me--or you," he added, shrewdly.

Nathan Gripp frowned. He cared very little about his clerk, but he
resented any want of respect to himself. He felt that the balance at his
bankers was large enough to insure him a high degree of consideration
from his work-people at least.

"How many vests are there?" he asked.

"Half a dozen."

"And the boy wants his pay, I suppose."

"He hasn't asked for it, but he will. They always do."

"Tell him we only pay when a full dozen are finished and brought in.
We'll credit him, or his mother, with these."

"That'll pay them off," thought the astute clothing merchant.

Samuel received this order with inward satisfaction, and went back
smiling.

"Well, young feller," said he, "it's all right. The vests ain't
over-well done, but we'll keep 'em. Now you can go."

But Dan did not move.

"It seems to me you've forgotten something," he said.

"What's that?"

"You haven't paid me for the work."

"It's all right. We'll pay when the next half dozen are brought in. Will
you take 'em now?"

Dan was disagreeably surprised. This was entirely out of the usual
course, and he knew very well that the delay would be a great
inconvenience.

"We've always been paid when we brought in work," he said.

"We've changed our rule," said the clerk, nonchalantly. "We only pay
when a full dozen are brought in."

"What difference does it make to you? We need the money, and can't
wait."

"It's my orders, young feller. It's what Mr. Gripp just told me."

"Then I'll speak to him," said Dan, promptly.

"Just as you like."

Dan approached the proprietor of the establishment.

"Mr. Gripp," said he, "I've just brought in half a dozen vests, but your
clerk here won't pay me for them."

"You will get your pay, young man, when you bring in another half
dozen."

"But, Mr. Gripp, we need the money. We haven't got a big bank account.
Our rent is due to-morrow."

"Is it, indeed? I don't see how that concerns me."

"Will you pay me to-night as a favor?" pleaded Dan, humbling himself for
his mother's sake.

"I can't break over my rule," said Nathan Gripp. "Besides, Samuel says
the work isn't very well done."

"Then he lies!" exclaimed Dan, provoked.

"Do you hear that, Mr. Gripp?" ejaculated the angry Samuel, his tallowy
complexion putting on a faint flush. "Didn't I tell you he was
impudent?"

Nathan Gripp's small black eyes snapped viciously.

"Boy," said he, "leave my store directly. How dare you address me in
such a way, you young tramp?"

"I'm no more a tramp than yourself," retorted Dan, now thoroughly angry.

"Samuel, come here, and put out this boy!" exclaimed Nathan, too
dignified to attempt the task himself.

Samuel advanced, nothing loth, his fishy eyes gleaming with pleasure.

"Get out, you vagabond!" he exclaimed, in the tone of authority.

"You're a couple of swindlers!" exclaimed Dan. "You won't pay for honest
work."

"Out with him, Samuel!" ordered Gripp.

Samuel seized Dan by the shoulder, and attempted to obey orders, but our
hero doubled him up with a blow from his fist, and the luckless clerk,
faint and gasping, staggered and nearly fell.

Dan stepped out on the sidewalk, and raising his hat, said, with mock
politeness, "Good-morning, gentlemen!" and walked away, leaving Gripp
and his assistant speechless with anger.

[Illustration: "You're a couple of swindlers!" exclaimed Dan. "You won't
pay for honest work." Page 30.]




CHAPTER IV.

AN ODD COUPLE.


When Dan's excitement was over, he felt that he had won a barren
victory. He had certainly been badly treated, and was justified in
yielding to his natural indignation; but for all that he had acted
unwisely.

Nathan Gripp had not refused payment, he had only postponed it, and as
he had the decided advantage, which money always has when pitted against
labor, it would have been well to have been conciliatory. Now Gripp
would undoubtedly annoy him with further delay, and refuse to give Mrs.
Mordaunt any further work.

"I suppose I've acted like a fool," said Dan to himself, with
compunction. "My spunk is always getting the better of me, and I am
afraid poor mother will have to suffer. Well, there's no use crying for
spilt milk; I must see what I can do to mend matters."

While these thoughts were passing through Dan's mind he found himself
passing the clothing establishment of Jackson & Co., who were special
rivals of Mr. Gripp.

"Perhaps I can get some work for mother here," thought Dan. "I'll try,
at any rate."

He entered, and looking about him, attracted the attention of a clerk.

"Do you want something in our line to-day?" asked the clerk, pleasantly.

"Yes, I do," said Dan, "if you're giving things away; but as I've got a
note of ten thousand dollars to meet to-morrow, I can't pay anything
out."

"Your credit ought to be good," said the salesman, smiling, "but we
don't trust."

"All right," said Dan; "I may as well proceed to business. My mother
makes vests for amusement. Can you give her any work?"

"I will speak to Mr. Jackson. One of our hands is sick, and if your
mother understands how to do the work, we may be able to give her some."

The young man went to the rear of the store, and returned with the
proprietor.

"Has your mother any experience?" asked the proprietor, a big man, with
sandy whiskers.

He was an Englishman, as any one might see, and a decided improvement on
Nathan Gripp, whom he cordially hated.

"Yes, sir; she has been making vests for the last two years."

"For whom has she been working?"

"For Nathan Gripp."

"Humph! Has Gripp discharged her?"

"No, sir; she has discharged him."

Mr. Jackson laughed, and nodded to his salesman. He rather enjoyed this
allusion to his rival.

"Then she didn't like Gripp?"

"No, sir. He paid her starvation wages and made her wait for the money.
He's a mean fellow."

"I don't admire him much myself," said the Englishman. "How much now did
he pay for vest-making?"

"Twenty cents apiece."

"We don't pay much more ourselves. There is so much competition that we
have to sell low."

"Mother would rather make for you at eighteen cents than for Gripp for
twenty," said Dan.

Mr. Jackson was pleased, but he said, by way of drawing out Dan:

"How do you know but I am a mean skinflint, too?"

"You don't look like one," said the boy.

Mr. Jackson smiled graciously.

"Joseph," said he, "have we any vests ready for making?"

"Yes, sir. We have some bundles of half a dozen each."

"Take this boy's name and address and give him one. My boy, we will pay
your mother twenty-five cents each, but we expect good work."

"You will be satisfied, sir," said Dan, confidently, and he left the
store in excellent spirits.

"It's turned out right, after all," thought he; "but I am afraid we
shall miss the money old Gripp owed mother. I don't know how we are
going to pay the rent to-morrow. We shall be over two dollars short
unless something turns up."

Dan carried the bundle of work home, and told his mother what had
happened. She was pleased with the increase of pay, but that was in the
future. It would be a week before she could collect any pay from Jackson
& Co., and the landlord would not wait.

"I wish I could think of some way of raising money," said Dan, putting
his face between his hands and looking thoughtful. "If you only had some
jewels, mother, that we could raise money on now, we would be all
right."

"I have nothing but my wedding-ring," said Mrs. Mordaunt, sadly.

"You must keep that, mother. Don't part with that unless you are obliged
to."

"I would rather not, Dan, but if there is no other way----"

"There must be another way. I will find another way. Just don't think of
it any more, mother. When does the landlord come?"

"Generally between twelve and one."

"Then we shall have all the forenoon to forage round in. It's only two
dollars and a half we want. I ought to be able to raise two dollars and
a half."

"That is a great deal of money to us now, Dan."

"I wonder whether Shorty wouldn't lend it to me?" said Dan,
reflectively.

"Who is Shorty, my son?"

"He is a little hump-backed dwarf that keeps a cigar stand down on
Broadway, not far from Trinity Church. He has a good trade, and doesn't
waste his money. Yes, I will ask Shorty."

"I hope he will be willing to grant your request, Dan."

"I hope so, too. He's a good-natured fellow, Shorty is, and he'll do it,
if he can. I'll see him the first thing to-morrow morning."

Somewhat cheered by Dan's confident tone, Mrs. Mordaunt went to sleep as
early as usual, forgetting the trouble possibly in store.

The next morning, before selling his papers, Dan went round to Shorty's
stand.

"Good-morning, Dan," said the dwarf, in a singularly melodious voice.

"Good-morning, Shorty. I thought I'd find you here."

"Yes, I begin business early."

"I am going to ask a favor of you," said Dan, abruptly.

"What is it, Dan?"

"Our rent's due to-day, and we are two dollars and a half short. I can
make the fifty cents before noon. Can you lend me two dollars till I am
able to pay it?"

To Dan's dismay Shorty shook his head.

"I wish I could, Dan, but there's something in the way."

"If you're afraid I won't pay you back, you needn't think of that. I
never went back on a fellow that lent me money yet."

"I am not afraid of trusting you, Dan, but I haven't got the money."

"I understand," said Dan, coldly, for he suspected this to be a
subterfuge.

"No, you don't understand," said Shorty, eagerly. "You think what I say
is a sham, but you wouldn't if you knew all."

"If I knew all," repeated Dan, surprised.

"Yes, I shall have to tell you. I didn't mean to, but I don't want you
to misunderstand me. The fact is, Dan," Shorty added, sheepishly, "I've
got more than myself to provide for now."

"What? You don't mean to say?" ejaculated Dan.

"I was married yesterday, Dan," said the cigar dealer, almost
apologetically, "and I've been buying furniture, and the fact is, I
haven't got a cent to spare."

"Of course you haven't," said Dan. "I never dreamed of this. Is your
wife--about your size?"

"No, Dan, she's rather tall. There she is, crossing the street. Do you
see her?"

Dan looked, and saw a tall woman, of twenty-five or thereabouts,
approaching the cigar stand. She was very plain, with a large mouth and
a long, aquiline nose.

"That's my wife," said the cigar dealer, regarding his tall partner with
evident pride. "Julia, my dear, this is my friend, Dan Mordaunt."

"Glad to see any friend of my husband," said the lady, in a deep, hoarse
voice, which might have been mistaken for a man's. "He must come and see
us."

"So I will, thank you," answered Dan, surveying the female grenadier
with a wondering glance.

"We live at No. -- Varick street, Dan, and I shall be very glad to see
you any evening."

"By gracious!" said Dan to himself, "that's the queerest match I ever
heard of. She might take Shorty up in her arms and carry him off. I
don't think he'll beat her very often," and Dan smiled at the thought.

The morning wore away, and at eleven o'clock Dan had earned forty cents.
He began to get discouraged. There didn't seem to be much prospect of
raising the rent before twelve o'clock.




CHAPTER V.

EFFECTING A LOAN.


As Dan stood on the sidewalk with his bundle of papers, and only forty
cents toward the two dollars and a half required for the rent, he felt
like many a business man who has a note to meet and not enough money on
hand to pay it. Indeed, he was worse off, for generally business men
have friends who can help them with a temporary loan, but Dan's friends
were quite as poor as himself. One, however, Dick Stanton, a mere boy,
had the reputation of being more saving than his companions. It was
known that he had an account in the Bowery Savings Bank, and among the
street boys he was considered wealthy.

"Perhaps I can borrow two dollars of him," thought Dan, as Dick passed
him on his way to Canal street.

"I say, Dick," said Dan, "stop a minute. I want to speak to you."

"Go ahead, Dan."

"I want you to lend me two dollars. Our rent is due, and I can raise it
all but that."

Dick shook his head, and was about to speak, when Dan said hurriedly,
for he felt that it was his last chance:

"You needn't be afraid of me, Dick; I'll pay you sure, and give you more
interest, too, than you get in the bank."

"I haven't got any money in the bank, Dan."

"You had last week," said Dan, suspiciously.

"So I had, but I haven't now."

"You don't want to lend--that's what's the matter."

"You are mistaken, Dan. I'm not a bit afraid of lending to you, but I
have lent my money already."

"Who to?" asked Dan, ungrammatically, falling into a mistake made by
plenty of greater age and better experience than himself. "Of course it
isn't any of my business," he added, "if you don't want to tell."

"I don't mind telling you, Dan. I've lent it to my aunt. She's got two
children, and a hard time to get along. Perhaps I shall never see it
again, but I couldn't refuse her."

"Of course you couldn't," said Dan, heartily. "You've done right, and
you won't be sorry for it. I wish I knew some way of making two dollars
before twelve o'clock."

"Are you in urgent need of two dollars, my boy?" asked a pleasant voice.

Dan turned, and met the face of the stranger introduced in the first
chapter.

"Yes, sir," he answered. "I want it the worst way."

"Have you been extravagant and run up bills, Dan?"

"No, sir; the only bill we have is the rent, and that comes due this
noon."

"How much is it?"

"Six dollars, sir."

"I thought you said you wanted to borrow _two_ dollars."

"I've got four dollars toward it, sir."

"Do you often fall behind when rent day comes, Dan?"

"No, sir; this is the first time in two years."

"How do you account for it? Has business been duller than usual during
the last month?"

"Yes, sir, I think it has. There hasn't been as much news in the papers,
and my sales have fallen off. There's another thing, too."

"What is that?"

"Mother has a dollar and twenty cents due her, and she can't collect
it."

"Is it for making vests?"

"Yes, sir. Mr. Gripp won't pay till she has made a full dozen."

"That seems inconsiderate."

"Oh, he's a mean fellow."

"I've a great mind to buy the debt of you."

"I wish you would, sir," said Dan, eagerly. "That would leave only sixty
cents short, for I shall make ten cents more before twelve o'clock, it's
likely."

"It is only half-past eleven. To put you quite at ease, I mean to lend
you five dollars, and help you collect your mother's bill."

"You are very kind, sir," said Dan, surprised and grateful; "but I don't
need so much."

"You may get short again when I am not here to assist you."

"Are you not afraid I shall never pay you, sir?"

"That thought won't keep me awake nights," said the gentleman, laughing.

"You sha'n't lose anything by me, sir; I promise you that," said Dan,
earnestly.

"Then come into the hotel with me, and we will arrange the matter in a
business-like way."

"All right, sir."

Dan followed his new friend into the Astor House, and up stairs into a
pleasant bedroom, which in its comfortable apartments reminded Dan of
the days before his father's failure.

"I wish I could live so again," he thought. "I don't like a
tenement-house."

Mr. Grant--for this was his name--took writing materials from his
valise, and seated himself at a table.

"I am going to draw up a note for you to sign," he said. "I probably
understand better than you the necessary form."

"Thank you, sir."

His pen ran rapidly over the paper, and in a minute or two he handed Dan
the following form of acknowledgment:


     "NEW YORK, Sept. 15, 18--.

     "For value received I promise to pay to Alexander Grant five
     dollars on demand with interest."


"Now," said Mr. Grant, "put your name at the bottom."

Dan did so.

"I added 'with interest,' but only as a form; I shall require none."

"I would rather pay it, sir."

"That may be as you please. How much will six per cent. interest make it
amount to in a year?"

"Five dollars and thirty cents," answered Dan, promptly.

"Good! I see you have not forgotten what you learned in school."

"I have ciphered through cube root," said Dan, with some pride. "I am
not sure whether I remember that now, but I could do any sum in square
root."

"It is a pity you could not have remained in school."

"I should like to; but it's no use crying for spilt milk."

"As long as you didn't spill it yourself," added Mr. Grant.

"No, sir; it was not my fault that I had to leave school."

Mr. Grant folded up the note and carefully deposited it in his wallet.

"The next thing is to hand you the money," he said. "Shall I give you a
five-dollar bill, or small bills?"

"Small bills, sir, if it is just as convenient."

Mr. Grant placed in Dan's hands two two-dollar bills and a one.

"One thing more," he said. "Give me an order on Mr. Gripp for the money
due your mother. It is as well to have it in your own handwriting. I
won't tell you how to write it. See if you can find a way."

Dan wrote an order, which Mr. Grant pronounced satisfactory.

"On the whole," said he, "I believe I will take you with me when I call
upon Mr. Gripp. Can you call here at three o'clock this afternoon?"

"Yes, sir."

"That is settled, then. We will see whether Mr. Gripp will be any more
polite to me than he was to you."

"He will be surprised to see me in your company," said Dan, laughing.

"It is a good thing to surprise the enemy, Dan. A surprise often leads
to victory. When does your landlord call for his rent?"

"Between twelve and one."

"Then I won't detain you longer. Remember your appointment at three."

"I won't forget it, sir."

"Well, I'm in luck!" said Dan to himself, as he emerged into the street.
"Who would have thought that a stranger would lend me so large a sum?
He's a trump, and no mistake. Now, if I could only sell the four papers
I have left before twelve o'clock. I don't want to get stuck on them."

Fortune was not tired of favoring Dan. In ten minutes he had sold his
papers, and turned his steps toward the humble home where his mother was
awaiting, not without anxiety, the visit of an unamiable landlord.




CHAPTER VI.

MORE THAN A MATCH.


Mrs. Mordaunt looked up anxiously as Dan entered the room. She had
little expectation that he had been able in one morning to make up the
large deficiency in the sum reserved for the rent, but there was a
possibility, and she clung to that. Dan thought of postponing the
relation of his good news, but when he saw his mother's anxious face, he
felt that it would be cruel.

So when she said, "Well, Dan?" he nodded his head cheerfully.

"I've got it, mother," he said.

"Thank God for all His goodness!" ejaculated Mrs. Mordaunt, fervently.

"You see He hasn't forgotten us," said Dan, gleefully.

"No, my boy, it is a rebuke to my momentary want of faith. How could you
raise so large a sum? Surely you did not earn it in one forenoon?"

"You're right there, mother. I'm not smart enough to earn two dollars
before twelve o'clock."

"But you've got the money, Dan?"

"Look at this, mother," and Dan displayed the bills.

"Where did you get them, Dan?" asked his mother, astonished.

"I borrowed them."

"I didn't know we had a friend left, able or willing to lend us that
sum."

"I borrowed them of Alexander Grant, of St. Louis, and gave my note for
them," answered Dan, in a tone of some importance.

"Alexander Grant, of St. Louis! I don't remember that name."

"He's a new friend of mine, mother. I haven't known him over twenty-four
hours. As the old friends have treated us so badly, I'm goin' in for new
ones."

"You quite mystify me, Dan. Tell me all about it."

Dan did so.

"He's very kind to a stranger, Dan. Heaven will reward him, I am sure."

"I hope it will, mother. I wish I was a rich man. I should enjoy helping
those who needed it. If I ever get rich--though it doesn't look much
like it now--I will do all the good I can. I wonder rich men don't do it
oftener."

"It springs from thoughtlessness sometimes, Dan."

"And from selfishness pretty often," added Dan, whose views of human
nature were considerably less favorable than they had been in his more
prosperous days. "A good many men are like Tom Carver, as he is now and
will be when he is grown up."

"Perhaps there are more good and generous men than we suppose, Dan,"
urged his mother, who liked to think well of her fellow-beings.

"Like Mr. Gripp and our landlord, for instance. By the way, I hear Mr.
Grab's steps on the stairs. I want to deal with him. Just you step into
the bedroom, mother."

Mrs. Mordaunt had no desire to meet Mr. Grab, but she was a little
afraid of Dan's impetuous temper.

"You will treat him respectfully, won't you, Dan?" she urged, as she
turned to go into the adjoining room.

Dan's eyes danced with fun.

"I'll treat him with all the respect he deserves, mother," he answered.

Mrs. Mordaunt looked a little doubtful, for she understood Dan, but did
not say more, for Mr. Grab was already knocking at the door.

"Don't come out, whatever you hear, mother," said Dan, in a low voice.
"I'll come out all right, though I shall tantalize him a little at
first."

The knock was repeated.

"Come in!" Dan called out, in a loud, clear tone.

The door opened, and a thin, undersized man, with bushy red hair and the
look of a cross mastiff, entered the room.

Before his entrance Dan had seated himself in the plain wooden
rocking-chair with his feet on a cricket. He looked quite easy and
unconcerned.

"How are you, Grab?" he said, in a friendly manner.

"You might call me _Mr._ Grab," returned the landlord, angrily.

"I've no objection, I'm sure, Mr. Grab," said Dan. "How is your health?
You're looking very yellow. Got the jaundice?"

"I am perfectly well, and I am not yellow at all. Do you mean to insult
me?" demanded Grab, irritated.

"I wouldn't do that for a cent, Mr. Grab. I am glad you feel well,
though you ain't looking so. It's very friendly of you to come round to
see me and mother."

"Where is your mother?" snapped Mr. Grab.

"She is engaged just now, and won't have the pleasure of seeing you."

"But I _must_ see her."

"Must! You are quite mistaken. You can't see her. You can see me."

"I've seen more of you than I want to already," said Grab.

"That isn't talking like a friend, Mr. Grab," said Dan, "when I'm so
glad to see you. Perhaps you have come on business."

"Of course I have come on business, and you know very well what that
business is, you young monkey."

"Thank you, Mr. Grab, you are very complimentary. It isn't about the
rent, is it?"

"Of course it is!" snapped the landlord.

"Oh, dear, how could I have forgotten that it was rent-day," said Dan,
with well-feigned confusion.

Mr. Grab's brow grew dark. He concluded that he wasn't going to collect
the rent, and that always chafed him.

"It's your business to know when rent-day comes," he said, bringing down
his fist with such emphasis on the table that he hurt his knuckles, to
Dan's secret delight.

"Please don't break the table, Grab," said Dan.

"Oh, blast the table!" said Grab, surveying his red knuckles.

"We haven't got any blasting powder, and I don't think it would be a
very interesting experiment. It might blow you up, for you are nearest
to it."

"Have done with this trifling, boy," said the landlord.

"I am afraid you got out of the wrong end of the bed this morning, Mr.
Grab. You should control yourself."

"Look here, boy," said the landlord, savagely, "do you know what I am
tempted to do?"

"No, what is it?" asked Dan, indifferently.

"I am strongly tempted to chastise you for your impudence."

Dan looked critically at the small, thin form, and secretly decided that
Mr. Grab would find it difficult to carry out his threat.

"Oh, how you frighten me!" he said. "I don't believe I shall sleep any
to-night."

Mr. Grab made a motion to pound on the table again, but he looked at his
red knuckles and wisely forbore.

"I can't waste any more time," he said. "You must pay your rent, or turn
out. I want six dollars."

"Won't it do, Mr. Grab, if we pay you next week?"

"No, it won't. The rent must be paid to-day, or out you go."

"Why doesn't Dan pay him?" thought Mrs. Mordaunt, uneasily. "Really, he
ought not to tease the poor man so. He has such a bad temper, he might
hurt Dan."

"Mr. Gripp is owing mother for work. As soon as he pays her, I will call
round at your office and pay you."

"It won't do," said Grab. "I won't let you stay here another night, and
I mean to have security for my money, too."

So saying, the landlord seized the bundle of vests which lay on the
table beside him.

This aroused Dan to action.

He sprang to his feet, his eyes flashing with anger.

"Put down that bundle, Mr. Grab!" he exclaimed.

"Then pay me my rent," said the landlord, recoiling a little.

"Put down that bundle before you say another word about rent. It isn't
my mother's or mine. You have no business with it."

"What do you mean, boy, by your impudence?" demanded the landlord, a
little uneasily.

"I mean that if you take that bundle from the room, I shall put you in
charge of the nearest policeman on a charge of stealing."

"That is nonsense," said Grab; but he looked nervous, and laid down the
bundle.

"All right, Grab," said Dan. "Now, as I don't want any more of your
company, I'll pay the rent, if you'll give me a receipt."

"Have you got the money?" asked Grab, astonished.

"Of course I have. I never told you I hadn't."

"You made me think so."

"It isn't my business what you think. There, that is settled, and now,
Mr. Grab, I have the honor of wishing you good-evening. I hope you won't
hurt your knuckles again."

Mr. Grab left the room, inwardly wishing that he could wring Dan's neck.

"Oh, Dan, how could you?" asked his mother, reproachfully, as she
re-entered the room.

"He deserves it all," said Dan. "Didn't he turn out the poor Donovans on
a cold day last winter? I have no pity for him."

"He may turn us out."

"Not as long as we pay the rent."




CHAPTER VII.

MR. GRIPP IS WORSTED.


Punctually at three o'clock Dan knocked at the door of Mr. Grant's room
in the Astor House.

That gentleman looked at his watch as he admitted our hero.

"You are punctual to the minute," he said. "Your watch keeps excellent
time."

"I'll tell you why," answered Dan, smiling. "I always keep it at
Tiffany's. I don't dare to carry it for fear it will get out of order."

"You ought to have a watch," said Mr. Grant. "That will come in time."

"I hope so," said Dan. "Then I could be sure to keep my business
appointments. Now I have to depend on the City Hall clock. I'd rather
look at it than carry it round."

"Well, Dan, do you think Mr. Gripp is prepared to receive us?"

"He'll be glad to see you. He'll think you are going to buy some
clothes. I don't think he'll be very happy to see me."

"He must see us both, or neither. Has he any good clothes?"

"Yes, sir--good enough for me. I don't think you would like to patronize
his establishment."

"By the way, Dan, you have given me an order for money, and I have not
handed you the equivalent."

"You may not get the money, sir."

"I will make the effort at any rate. By the way, Dan, that coat of yours
is getting shabby."

"It is the best I have, sir. Boys in my business don't have to dress
much."

"That gives me an idea. Please hand me my hat, and we will start."

The two left the Astor House together. One or two of Dan's associates
whom they encountered on the way, were surprised to see him walking on
terms of apparent friendly companionship with a well-to-do stranger, but
decided that Dan was probably acting as his guide.

They found Mr. Gripp standing as usual in the door-way of his shop
watching for customers. He did not at first observe Dan, but his
attention was drawn to Mr. Grant.

"Walk in, sir," he said, obsequiously. "You will find what you want
here. Styles fashionable, and as for prices--we defy competition."

Alexander Grant paused, and looked critically about him. He understood
very well the sort of establishment he was about to enter, and would not
have thought of doing so but in Dan's interests.

He stepped over the threshold, and Dan was about to follow, when the
eagle eye of Mr. Gripp recognized our hero.

"Clear out, you young rascal!" he exclaimed. "Don't you come round here
any more."

Dan did not answer, for he knew Mr. Grant would do so for him.

Mr. Grant turned back, and said, quietly:

"To whom are you speaking, sir?"

"I beg your pardon, sir--it's that boy."

"Then, sir, you will oblige me by stopping at once. That boy is in my
company and under my protection."

Nathan Gripp stared as if transfixed.

"Do you know him, sir?" he asked.

"Yes, sir."

"You are mistaken in him, sir. He's an artful young rascal. He was here
yesterday, and acted outrageously. He assaulted my clerk and insulted
me."

"I have nothing to do with that. He is in my company, and if I enter the
store he will."

"Oh, of course, if he's with you he can come in. Samuel, show the
gentleman what he wants."

Dan smiled, and nothing but a sense of his own interest prevented Mr.
Gripp from objecting to his entrance.

"What will I show you, sir?" asked the callow young man named Samuel,
glaring at Dan in vivid remembrance of the blow which had doubled him
up.

"Have you any coats and vests that will fit this young gentleman?"

"Young gentleman!" repeated Samuel, mechanically, glancing at Dan in
silent hatred.

"That means me, Samuel," said Dan, mischievously. "Samuel is an old
friend of mine, Mr. Grant."

"I think we can fit him," said Samuel, by no means relishing the task of
waiting upon his young opponent. "Take off your coat, young feller."

"Don't be too familiar, Samuel. You may call me Mr. Mordaunt," said Dan.

"I'll be ---- if I do," muttered the young man.

Dan took off his coat, and tried on the one submitted to his inspection.
He afterward tried on the vest, and they proved to be a good fit.

"Do they suit you, Dan?" asked Mr. Grant.

"Yes, sir, they fit as well as if they had been made for me."

"What is the price of these articles, young man?" asked Mr. Grant.

"Twelve dollars," answered Samuel.

"He'll take eight," suggested Dan, in a low voice.

Mr. Grant knew well enough the ways of Chatham street merchants to
appreciate the suggestion.

"That is too high," he said, quietly.

Samuel, who was trained to read customers, after a glance at Mr. Grant's
face, prepared to reduce the price.

"We might say eleven," he said, meditatively. "Shall I put them up?"

"Not at that price."

"You don't want us to give 'em away?" said Samuel, in the tone of one
whose reasonable demands had been objected to.

"There is no fear of that, I apprehend," returned Mr. Grant, dryly.

"I've no objection, I'm sure," remarked Dan, on his own account.

"I'd make a few remarks to you, young feller, if you were alone," he
read in the eyes of the indignant salesman, and Dan enjoyed the
restraint which he knew Samuel was putting upon himself.

"You are still asking too much," said the customer.

"What'll you give, sir?" asked Samuel, diplomatically.

"Eight dollars."

"Eight dollars! Why the cloth cost more than that!" protested Samuel.

"The work didn't cost you much, I presume."

"We pay the highest prices for work in this establishment, sir," said
Samuel, hastily.

He forgot that Dan knew better.

"So they do, Mr. Grant," said Dan. "They pay twenty cents apiece for
making vests."

"We pay more than that to our best hands," said Samuel.

"You told me you never paid more," retorted Dan.

Mr. Grant interrupted this discussion.

"Young man," said he, "I will give you eight dollars for the clothes."

"Say nine, sir."

"Not a cent more."

As the regular price was eight dollars--when they couldn't get any
more--Samuel felt authorized to conclude the bargain without consulting
Mr. Gripp.

"Shall I do up the clothes?" he asked.

"No," said Dan, "I'll wear 'em. You may put up my old ones."

Samuel felt it derogatory to his dignity to obey the orders of our hero,
but there was no alternative.

The bundle was placed in Dan's hands.

"Now write me a receipt for the price," said Mr. Grant.

This was done.

Mr. Grant counted out six dollars and eighty cents.

"I have an order upon you for the balance," he said.

"I don't understand," ejaculated Samuel.

"Your principal owes my young friend, or his mother, one dollar and
twenty cents for work. This you will receive as part of the price."

"I must see Mr. Gripp," said Samuel.

Mr. Gripp came forward frowning.

"We can't take the order, sir," he said. "The boy's money is not yet
due."

"Isn't the work done and delivered?"

"Yes, sir; but it is our rule not to pay till a whole dozen is
delivered."

"Then it is a rule which you must break," said Mr. Grant, firmly.

"We can't."

"Then I refuse to take the suit."

Nathan Gripp did not like to lose the sale on the one hand, or abdicate
his position on the other.

"Tell your mother," he said to Dan, "that when she has finished another
half-dozen vests I will pay her the whole."

He reflected that the stranger would be gone, and Dan would be in his
power.

"Thank you," said Dan, "but mother's agreed to work for Jackson. He
pays better."

"Then you'll have to wait for your pay," said Mr. Gripp, sharply.

"Don't you care to sell this suit?" asked Mr. Grant, quickly.

"Yes, sir, but under the circumstances we must ask all cash."

"You won't get it, sir."

"Then I don't think we care to sell," said Gripp, allowing his anger to
overcome his interest.

"Very good. I think, Dan, we can find quite as good a bargain at
Jackson's. Mr. Gripp, do I understand that you decline to pay this
bill?"

"I will pay when the other half-dozen vests are made," said Gripp,
stubbornly.

"I have nothing to do with that. The bill is mine, and it is with me you
have to deal. The boy has nothing to do with it."

"Is that so?" asked Gripp, in surprise.

"It is. You may take your choice. Settle the bill now, or I shall
immediately put it in a lawyer's hands, who will know how to compel you
to pay it."

A determined will carries the day.

"Take this gentleman's money, Samuel," said Gripp, in a tone of
annoyance.

There was no further trouble. Dan walked out of the store better
dressed than he had been since the days of his prosperity.

"How can I thank you, Mr. Grant?" he said, gratefully.

"By continuing to care for your mother, my lad. You are lucky to have a
mother living. Mine is dead, God bless her! Now, my lad, what do you
think of my success in collecting bills?"

"You were too many for old Gripp, sir. He won't sleep to-night."

"He doesn't deserve to, for he grows rich by defrauding the poor who
work for him."

Opposite the City Hall Park Dan and his friend separated.

"I shall not see you again, my boy," said Mr. Grant, "for I take the
evening train. If you ever come to St. Louis, find me out."

"I will, sir."

"That's a good man," said Dan, as he wended his way homeward. "If there
were more such, it would be good for poor people like mother and me. If
I ever get rich, I mean to help along those that need it."




CHAPTER VIII.

MIKE RAFFERTY'S TRICK.


Dan carefully husbanded the money which Mr. Grant had lent him, and the
result was that for two months he was comparatively easy in his
circumstances. His mother earned five cents more daily, on account of
the higher price she received for work, and though this was a trifle, it
was by no means to be despised where the family income was so small as
in the case of the Mordaunts.

Still Dan was not satisfied.

"Mother," said he, "I suppose I ought to be contented with earning
enough to pay our expenses, but I should like to be saving something."

"Yes, Dan, it would be pleasant. But we ought to be thankful for what we
are now receiving."

"But, mother, suppose I should fall sick? What should we do then?"

Mrs. Mordaunt shuddered.

"Don't mention such a thing, Dan," she said. "The very idea terrifies
me."

"But it might happen, for all that."

"Don't you feel well, Dan? Is anything the matter with you?" asked Mrs.
Mordaunt, anxiously.

"Don't be frightened, mother," answered Dan, laughing. "I'm as strong as
a horse, and can eat almost as much. Still, you know, we would feel
safer to have a little money in the savings-bank."

"There isn't much chance of that, Dan, unless we earn more than we do
now."

"You are right there. Well, I suppose there is no use thinking of it. By
the way, mother, you've got enough money on hand to pay the rent
to-morrow, haven't you?"

"Yes, Dan, and a dollar over."

"That's good."

The door of the room was partly open, and the last part of the
conversation was heard by Mike Rafferty, the son of the tenant who
occupied the room just over the Mordaunts. He was a ne'er-do-well, who
had passed more than one term of imprisonment at Blackwell's Island. His
mother was an honest, hard-working washerwoman, who toiled early and
late to support herself and her three children. Mike might have given
her such assistance that she could have lived quite comfortably, for her
own earnings were by no means inconsiderable. Her wash-tub paid her much
more than Mrs. Mordaunts needle could possibly win, and she averaged a
dollar a day where her more refined neighbor made but twenty-five
cents. But Mike, instead of helping, was an additional burden. He got
his meals regularly at home, but contributed scarcely a dollar a month
to the common expenses. He was a selfish rowdy, who was likely to belong
permanently to the shiftless and dangerous classes of society.

Mike had from time to time made approaches to intimacy with Dan, who was
nearly two years younger, but Dan despised him for his selfishly
burdening his mother with his support, and didn't encourage him.
Naturally, Mike hated Dan, and pronounced him "stuck up" and proud,
though our hero associated familiarly with more than one boy ranking no
higher in the social scale than Mike Rafferty.

Only the day before, Mike, finding himself out of funds, encountering
Dan on the stairs, asked for the loan of a quarter.

"I have no money to spare," answered Dan.

"You've got money, Dan; I saw you take out some a minute ago."

"Yes, I've got the money, but I won't lend it."

"You're a mane skinflint," said Mike, provoked.

"Why am I?"

"Because you've got the money, and you won't lend it."

"What do you want to do with it?"

"I want to go to the Old Bowery to-night, if you must know."

"If you wanted it for your mother I might have lent it to you, though I
need all I can earn for my own mother."

"It's for my mother I want it, thin," said Mike. "I guess I won't go to
the theater to-night."

"That's too thin. Your mother would never see the color of it."

"Won't you lend me, thin?"

"No, I can't. If you want money, why don't you earn it, as I do?"

"I ain't lucky."

"It isn't luck. If you go to work and sell papers or black boots, you
will be able to help your mother and pay your way to the theater
yourself."

"Kape your advice to yourself," said Mike, sullenly. "I don't want it."

"You'd rather have my money," said Dan, good-humoredly.

"I'll never see that. You're too mane."

"All right. I'll be _mane_, then."

"I'd like to put a head on you," muttered Mike.

"I've got one already. I don't need another," said Dan.

"Oh, you think you're mighty smart wid your jokes," said Mike.

Dan smiled and walked off, leaving Mike more his enemy than ever.

This was the boy who overheard Mrs. Mordaunt say that she had more than
the rent already saved up. Mike's cupidity was excited. He knew that it
must amount to several dollars, and this he felt would keep him in
cigarettes and pay for evenings at the theater for several days.

"I wish I had it," he said to himself. "I wonder where the ould woman
kapes it."

The more Mike thought of it the more he coveted this money, and he set
to work contriving means to get possession of it.

Finally he arranged upon a plan.

About three o'clock in the afternoon he knocked at Mrs. Mordaunt's door.
She answered the knock in person.

"Mike Rafferty!" she said, in surprise. "Won't you come in?"

"Oh, no; I can't. It's bad news I bring you about Dan."

"What is it? Tell me quick, in Heaven's name!" she exclaimed, her heart
giving a great bound.

"He's been run over, ma'am, by a hoss, in front of the Astor House, and
they took him into the drug store at the corner. He wants you to go
right over."

"Is he--badly hurt?" asked the agonized mother.

"I guess he's broke his leg," said Mike.

In two minutes Mrs. Mordaunt, trembling with apprehension, her faltering
limbs almost refusing to bear her weight, was on her way to the Astor
House.

As Mike had calculated, she did not stop to lock the door.

The young scape-grace entered the deserted room, rummaged about till he
found the scanty hoard reserved for the landlord, and then went off
whistling.

"Now I'll have a bully time," he said to himself. "Didn't I fool the
ould woman good?"




CHAPTER IX.

MIKE'S THEFT IS DISCOVERED.


Dan was standing in front of the Astor House, talking to a boy
acquaintance, when his mother tottered up to him in a state of great
nervous agitation.

"Why, mother, what's the matter?" asked Dan, in surprise. "What brings
you out this afternoon?"

"Oh, Dan!" she gasped, "are you hurt?"

Dan opened his eyes in wonder. It occurred to him that his mother must
have lost her mind.

"Hurt!" he repeated.

"Yes; they told me you were run over, and had your leg broken."

"My leg broken! Who told you so?"

"Mike Rafferty."

"Then I wish I had him here," said Dan, indignantly; "I'd let him know
whether my leg is broken or not. You bet I would!"

"Haven't you been run over, then?"

"Not that I know of, and I guess it couldn't be done without my knowing
it."

"I am so glad, so relieved!" sighed Mrs. Mordaunt. "I don't know how I
got here, I was so agitated."

"When did Mike Rafferty tell you this cock-and-bull story, mother?"
asked Dan.

"Only a few minutes ago. He said you had been taken into a drug store,
and wanted me to come right over."

"It's a mean trick he played on you, mother," said Dan, indignantly. "I
don't see what made him do it."

"Nor I," said Mrs. Mordaunt. "He must have meant it as a joke."

"A pretty poor joke. I'll get even with him for that."

"I don't mind it now, Dan, since I have you safe. I am ready to forgive
him. He didn't know how much he was distressing me."

"Then he ought to have known. You may forgive him if you want to; I
sha'n't."

"I will go home now, Dan. I feel a good deal happier than I did when I
was hurrying over here."

"I will go with you, mother. I have sold my papers, and sha'n't work any
more this afternoon. Where did you leave Mike? I hope I can come across
him soon."

"I left him at the door of our room."

"Did you lock the door when you came away, mother?" asked Dan.

"No; I believe not."

"Then let us go home at once. Some one might get in."

"There isn't much to take, Dan," said Mrs. Mordaunt, with a faint smile.

"There is our rent money, mother."

"I didn't think of that."

"We shall be in a pretty pickle if that is lost."

"You don't think Mike would take it do you, Dan?"

"I think he would if he knew where to find it."

"I wish I had brought it with me," said Mrs. Mordaunt, in a tone of
anxiety.

"Don't fret, mother; I guess it's all right."

"Perhaps you had better go home at once without waiting for me, Dan. You
can go quicker."

"All right; I'll do it. Where is the money?"

"In my pocket-book, in the drawer of the work-table."

"Are the drawers locked?"

"No."

"Then hereafter you'd better lock them. Well, I'll be off, and will meet
you at the room."

Dan was not long in reaching his humble home. The more he thought of it,
the more he distrusted Mike, and feared that he might have had a
sinister design in the deception he had practiced upon his mother. To
lose the rent money would be a serious matter. Mr. Grab hated him, he
knew full well, and would show no mercy, while in the short time
remaining it would be quite impossible to make up the necessary sum.

Dan sprang up the stairs, several at a bound, and made his way at once
to the little work-table. He pulled the drawer open without ceremony,
and in feverish haste rummaged about until, to his great joy, he found
the pocket-book.

His heart gave a joyous bound.

"It's all right, after all," he said. "Mike isn't so bad as I thought
him."

He opened the pocket-book, and his countenance fell. There was a
twenty-five cent scrip in one of the compartments, and that was all.

"He's stolen the money, after all," he said, his heart sinking. "What
are we going to do now?"

He waited till his mother reached home. She looked inquiringly at him.
One glance told her what had happened.

"Is it gone, Dan?" she gasped.

"That is all that is left," answered Dan, holding up the scrip.

"Mike could not be wicked enough to take it."

"Couldn't he, though? You don't know him as I do, mother. He's a mean
thief, and he sent you off to have a clear field. I wish you had locked
the door."

"I couldn't think of that, or anything else, Dan, when I thought you
were hurt."

"That's why he told you."

"What can we do, Dan? Mr. Grab will be angry when he finds we can't pay
him."

"I will try to find Mike; and if I do, I will get the money if I can.
That's the first thing."

Dan went up stairs at once, and knocked at Mrs. Rafferty's door.

She came to the door, her arms dripping with suds, for she had been
washing.

"Is it you, Dan?" she said. "And how is your mother to-day?"

"Is Mike in?" asked Dan, abruptly, too impatient to answer the question.

"No; he went out quarter of an hour ago."

"Did he tell you where he was going, Mrs. Rafferty?"

"Yes, he did. He said he was going over to Brooklyn to see if he could
get a job, shure. Did you want him?"

"Yes, I did, Mrs. Rafferty. I'm sorry to tell you that Mike has played a
bad trick on my mother."

"Oh, whirra, whirra, what a bye he is!" wailed Mrs. Rafferty. "He's
always up to something bad. Sorra bit of worruk he does, and I at the
wash-tub all day long."

"He's a bad son to you, Mrs. Rafferty."

"So he is, Dan, dear. I wish he was like you. And what kind of trick has
he played on your good mother?"

"He told her that I had been run over and broken my leg. Of course she
went out to find me, thinking it was all true, and while she was away he
took the money from her pocket-book."

Some mothers would have questioned this statement, but Mrs. Rafferty
knew to her cost that Mike was capable of stealing, having been
implicated in thefts on several occasions.

"Was it much, Dan?" she asked.

"Six or seven dollars. I can't say just how much."

"Oh, what a bad bye! I don't know what to do wid him, shure."

"It was the money we were to pay our rent with to-morrow," continued
Dan. "It is a very serious matter."

"I wish I could make it up to you, Dan, dear. It's a shame it is."

"You are an honest woman, Mrs. Rafferty, but you ought not to make it
up. I wish I could find Mike. Do you think he has really gone to
Brooklyn."

"Shure, I don't know. He said so."

"He might have done it as a blind, just to put me on the wrong scent."

"So he might, shure."

"Well, Mrs. Rafferty, I can't stop any longer. I'll try to find him."

He went down stairs and told his mother what he had discovered or failed
to discover.

"Don't wait supper for me, mother," he said. "I'm going in search of
Mike."

"You won't fight with him, Dan?" said Mrs. Mordaunt, anxiously.

"I can't promise, mother. I will only agree to be prudent. I am not
going to submit to the loss without trying to get the money back, you
may be sure of that."

So Dan went down stairs, considerably perplexed in mind. Mike was sure
to keep out of the way for a time at least, anticipating that Dan would
be upon his track. While our hero was searching for him, he would have
plenty of opportunities of spending the money of which he had obtained
unlawful possession. To punish him without regaining the contents of the
lost pocket-book would be an empty triumph. In the street below Dan
espied Terence Quinn, an acquaintance of Mike.

"How are you, Terence?" he said. "Have you seen anything of Mike?"

"I saw him only a few minutes ago."

"Where did he go?"

"I don't know."

"I want to see him on business."

"I'll tell you where he'll be this evening."

"Where?"

"He's going to the Old Bowery, and I'm goin' wid him."

"Does he treat?"

"Yes."

"Where did he get the money?"

"He didn't tell me," said Terence.

"He's taken the rent money. I'm sure of it now," said Dan to himself. "I
wish I knew where to find him."




CHAPTER X.

DAN AS A DETECTIVE.


Dan quickly decided that if Mike had been going to Brooklyn, he would
not have announced it under the circumstances.

"He meant to send me there on a wild-goose chase," he reflected. "I am
not quite so green as he takes me to be."

Dan could not decide as easily where Mike had gone. Hood says in his
poem of "The Lost Heir,"


     "A boy as is lost in London streets is like a needle in a bundle
       of hay."


A hunt for a boy in the streets of New York is about equally hopeless.
But Dan did not despair.

"I'll just stroll round a little," he said to himself. "Maybe I'll find
him."

Dan bent his steps toward the Courtlandt-street Ferry.

"Perhaps Mike has gone to Jersey City," he said to himself. "Anyway,
I'll go over there."

It was not an expensive journey. Six cents would defray Dan's expenses
both ways, and he was willing to incur this expense. He meant to look
about him, as something might turn up by which he could turn an honest
penny.

Something did turn up.

Near him in the cabin of the ferry-boat sat a gentleman of middle age,
who seemed overloaded with baggage. He had two heavy carpet-bags, a
satchel, and a bundle, at which he looked from time to time with a
nervous and uncomfortable glance. When the boat touched shore he tried
to gather his various pieces of luggage, but with indifferent success.
Noticing his look of perplexity, Dan approached him, and said,
respectfully:

"Can't I assist you, sir?"

"I wish you would, my boy," said the gentleman, relieved.

"All right, sir. I'll take one of the carpet-bags and the satchel, if
you like."

"Thank you; that will do nicely."

So the two left the boat together.

"Where are you going, sir?" asked Dan.

"Do you know the wharf of the Cunard steamers?" asked the gentleman.

"Yes, sir."

"Is it far off?"

"Not more than five or six minutes' walk," answered Dan.

"Can you help me as far as that with my luggage?"

"Yes, sir."

"I will make it worth your while, and you will be doing me a great favor
besides. I was brought down to the ferry, but the rascally hackman
demanded five dollars more to carry me across and land me at the Cunard
pier. He thought I would have to submit to this imposition, but I was so
indignant that I tried to handle all my luggage myself. I don't know how
I should have managed without you."

"I won't charge you so much, sir," said Dan, smiling.

"It isn't for the money I cared so much as for the imposition. I would
rather pay you ten dollars than the hackman five."

"Be careful, sir," said Dan, smiling, "or I may take advantage of your
liberal offer."

The gentleman smiled in turn.

"You don't look like a boy that would take advantage of a traveler."

"You can't judge from appearances, sir. I have been robbed of six
dollars to-day, and I might try to make it up that way."

"You have been robbed! How?"

Dan briefly related the circumstances.

"Was it all the money your mother had?"

"Yes, sir."

"How did you happen to be coming across the ferry?"

"I thought Mike might be here somewhere."

By this time they were in sight of the Cunard wharf.

"Were you ever on a Cunard steamer?" asked the gentleman.

"No, sir."

"Help me on board with my luggage, and I will show you about."

"I thought the steamers generally left in the morning," said Dan.

"So they do; but to-day the tide did not serve till later."

Dan helped Mr. Stevens down below with his luggage, and assisted him in
storing them in his stateroom. He surveyed with interest the cabin, the
deck, the dining-saloon, and the various arrangements.

"Well," said the gentleman, smiling, "how do you like it?"

"First-rate, sir."

"Do you think you would like to be going with me?"

"Yes, sir, but for my mother."

"Of course, it won't do to desert her; otherwise I might be tempted to
make you an offer. I am sure you would be very useful to me."

"I should like it very much, if mother did not need me."

Dan went up stairs with Mr. Stevens, and remained till visitors were
warned that it was time to go ashore.

"I must go, sir," he said.

Mr. Stevens drew a five-dollar bill from his vest pocket and handed it
to Dan.

"I haven't any change, sir," said Dan.

"None is required," said the gentleman, smiling.

"Do you really mean to give me five dollars, sir?"

"That is what the hackman wanted to charge me."

"But it was too much."

"It was too much for him; it is not too much for you, if I am willing to
give it to you."

"You are very kind, sir," said Dan, almost doubting the reality of his
good fortune.

"It will prove that I spoke truly when I said I didn't care for the
amount of money, only for the imposition. I am really very glad to give
it to you. Good-by, my boy."

He offered his hand. Dan shook it heartily, and, wishing him a pleasant
voyage, descended the gangplank.

"That is almost as much as Mike robbed me of," he said to himself. "How
lucky I came over to Jersey City! Now, if I could only get back part of
the money Mike robbed me of, I should be the better off for his mean
trick."

Dan did not immediately return to New York. He had been so fortunate
that he decided to spend the rest of the afternoon as he liked.

He walked on for ten minutes, Mike being temporarily out of his mind,
when his attention was suddenly drawn to him. Just in front of him he
saw Mike himself swaggering along, with a ten-cent cigar in his mouth,
and both hands thrust deep in his trousers pockets. He was strolling
along in fancied security, not dreaming of the near presence of the boy
whom he had so meanly robbed.

Dan's eyes sparkled when he recognized his enemy, and hastening his
pace, he put his hand on Mike's shoulder.

Mike turned quickly, and his countenance changed when he saw Dan.

"Has he found it out?" suggested his guilty conscience. "Anyway, he
can't prove anything. I'll bluff him off."

"Hallo, Dan!" he said, in affected cordiality. "What brings you over
here?"

"What brings _you_ over here, Mike?" asked Dan, significantly.

"I'm looking for a job," said Mike.

"You look like it," retorted Dan, "with both hands in your pockets and
a cigar in your mouth! Times seem to be good with you. How much did that
cigar cost?"

"I don't know," answered Mike, with unblushing falsehood. "A man gave it
to me for holdin' his hoss."

Mike was never at a loss for a plausible lie.

"I thought you bought it."

"I haven't got any money."

"Did they let you over the ferry free, then?"

"Oh, I had money enough for that."

"I guess you have got more."

"No, I haven't. Ten cents was all I had."

"Then how are you going to take Terence Quinn to the theater to-night?"
asked Dan.

Even Mike's brazen effrontery was hardly prepared to meet this
unexpected question.

"What do you mane?" he stammered.

"Terence told me you had invited him."

"Then he lies!" said Mike, his self-assurance returning. "He invited
me."

"Look here, Mike Rafferty," said Dan, out of patience; "that won't go
down! Terence told the truth. I know where you got the money you were
going to treat him with."

"Where, then?"

"From my mother's pocket-book."

"It's a lie!" blustered Mike.

"It's the truth, and if you don't hand over what's left without making
any more trouble, I'll have you arrested."

"You can't. We're in Jersey----"

"I shall have you arrested as soon as you get home."

"I didn't take the money," said Mike, sullenly.

"You did, and you know it," said Dan, firmly. "Give me what you have
left, and I'll make no trouble about it. If you don't, you're booked for
another term at the island."

Mike tried to save his ill-gotten gains, but Dan was persistent, and
finally extracted from him four dollars and a half. The rest Mike
pretended he had spent. He was sly enough, however, to have saved enough
to take him to the Old Bowery.

On the whole, Dan was satisfied, considering the five dollars he had
received on the Cunard steamer, but he could not forbear giving Mike a
farewell shot.

"How did it happen, Mike, that you took the Jersey Ferry to Brooklyn?"

Mike did not deign a reply.

"That is my first appearance as a detective," thought Dan. "It seems to
pay."




CHAPTER XI.

DAN HAS ANOTHER ADVENTURE.


It was only five o'clock when Dan, returning from Jersey City, found
himself again in front of the Astor House.

"Shall I buy any evening papers?" Dan asked himself. "No, I won't. I've
made enough to satisfy me for one day."

Dan stood at the corner of Vesey street, glancing at the hurrying
crowds.

He rather enjoyed his temporary freedom from business cares.

He had made a good day's work, the morrow's rent was provided for, and
he felt like a gentleman of leisure.

All at once his attention was drawn to a low sob. It proceeded from a
little flower-girl of ten years, who usually stood near the hotel.

"What's the matter, Fanny?" asked Dan, calling her by her name, for the
little flower-girl was one of his acquaintances. "Haven't you sold as
many bouquets as usual?"

"Yes," said Fanny, pausing in her sobs, "I've sold more."

"Then what's the matter? Has any one been teasing you?"

"No, but a young man passed a bad half-dollar on me."

"Let me see it."

Dan inspected the piece. He did not need to ring it, for it was dull in
appearance and unmistakably bad.

"When did you take it?"

"Just now. A young man came up and bought a five-cent bouquet, and gave
me this to change."

"Didn't you see that it was bad?"

"I didn't look at it till afterward. Then it was too late."

"So you gave him forty-five cents in good money, Fanny?"

"Yes," said the little girl, again beginning to sob.

"How many bouquets had you sold?"

"Seven."

"Then you have less money than when you began?"

"Yes, Dan."

"Do you think the fellow knew the piece was bad?"

"Yes, for he hurried away."

"Which way did he go?"

"Down Broadway."

"Maybe he was going to Jersey City."

"No, I saw him turn down Fulton street."

"Then he was going to Brooklyn. How did he look?"

"He was short and had red hair."

"How was he dressed?"

"He had on a gray suit."

"How long ago did this happen?"

"About five minutes."

"Give me the bad piece, and I'll go after him. Stay here till I come
back."

Dan seized the money, and proceeded toward Fulton Ferry at a half run.

"I hope he won't have taken the boat," he said to himself. "If he has I
shall lose him."

Dan nearly overthrew an apple woman's stand not far from the ferry, but
did not stop to apologize. He ran into a fat gentleman who looked
daggers at him, but kept on.

Breathless he paid his ferriage, and just succeeded in catching a boat
as it was leaving the New York pier.

Thus far he had not seen the young man of whom he was in search.

"He may be on board the boat. I'll go forward," said Dan to himself.

He walked through the ladies' cabin, and stepped out on the forward
deck. The boat was crowded, for it was at the time when men who live in
Brooklyn, but are employed in New York, are returning to their homes.

Dan looked about him for a time without success, but all at once his
eyes lighted up. Just across the deck, near the door of the gentlemen's
cabin, stood a young man with red hair, holding a small bouquet in his
hand. His face was freckled, his eyes small, and he looked capable of
meanness.

Of course appearances are often deceptive, but not unfrequently a man's
character can be read upon his face.

"That's the fellow that cheated poor Fanny, I'll bet a hat," Dan decided
within himself. "He looks like it."

He immediately crossed to the other side of the deck.

The red-headed young man was talking to another young man of about the
same age.

"Where did you get that bouquet, Sanderson?" asked the latter.

"Bought it of a little girl in front of the Astor House," answered
Sanderson.

"That settles it," thought Dan.

He waited to hear what would come next.

"I suppose it is meant for some young lady," suggested the other.

"Maybe it is," answered Sanderson, with a grin.

Dan thought it was about time to come to business.

He touched the red-haired young man on the arm.

Sanderson looked round.

"Well, boy, what is it?" he asked.

"You bought that bouquet of a girl near the Astor House," said Dan.

"What if I did?" asked Sanderson, uneasily, for he had a suspicion of
what was coming.

"You gave her a bogus half-dollar in payment," continued Dan.

"Do you mean to insult me?" blustered Sanderson. "Be off with you."

"I am sorry I cannot accommodate you," said Dan, "but I want you to give
me a good piece for this first."

"I never saw that half-dollar before," said Sanderson. "I gave her good
money."

"Perhaps you can prove that before the court," said Dan.

"What do you mean?" demanded Sanderson, uneasily.

"I mean that you have passed counterfeit money, and unless you give me a
good piece for it I will give you in charge as soon as we reach the
pier," said Dan, firmly.

Sanderson looked about him, and saw that the boy's charge was believed.
Soon his friend looked disgusted. Dan followed up his attack.

"Fanny is a poor girl," he said. "I found her crying over her loss, for
it was more than all the money she had taken to-day."

"Are you her friend?" asked Sanderson, sneering.

"Yes, I am," said Dan, stoutly.

"This is a put-up job between you two," said Sanderson.

"Gentlemen," said Dan, turning and appealing to the passengers near him,
"this young man has passed a bad fifty-cent piece on a poor flower-girl.
Shall he make it good?"

"Yes, yes!" exclaimed half a dozen, and several cried "shame!" with
looks of scorn and disgust directed toward the young man with red hair.

"I don't believe a word of it," he ejaculated, in a rage. "I gave the
girl a quarter."

"Too thin!" said several.

"But I'll give you the money to get rid of you," and he threw a
half-dollar at Dan with a look very far from amiable.

"Thank you, sir; here's your money," said Dan.

Though Sanderson had disclaimed all knowledge of the bogus half-dollar,
he took it and put it carefully in his pocket.

"Keep it to pay your washerwoman with," said a jeering voice.

It was a young fellow in the garb of a workman who spoke.

The boat touched the pier, and Sanderson was only too glad to hurry away
from the unfriendly crowd.

"You're a smart boy!" cried a keen-looking businessman, addressing Dan.
"How did you discover that this fellow was the one that passed the
coin."

"Fanny described him to me."

"Then you hadn't seen him before?"

"No, sir."

"What are you doing for a living?"

"Selling papers, sir."

"You are fit for something better. Come and see me to-morrow."

He placed in Dan's hands a card bearing the firm's name


     BARTON & ROGERS,
     Commission Merchants,
               No. -- Pearl street.


"My name is Rogers," he continued. "Inquire for me."

"Thank you, sir."

Dan was so pleased at having recovered Fanny's money that he gave
little thought to this last incident, though it was destined to exert an
important influence on his fortunes. He took the same boat back to New
York, and hurried to the Astor House.

Little Fanny, the flower-girl, with a sad look upon her face, was still
standing in her wonted place.

"I've got your money back, Fanny," said Dan.

"Oh, have you?" exclaimed Fanny, joyfully.

"Yes; I made the fellow give it up."

"Oh, how kind you are, Dan!"

There was a listener to what passed between the two children. A tall
lady, standing at the corner of the street, regarded them attentively.
She was evidently revolving some plan in her head. As Dan was about
turning away, she placed her hand on his arm.

"Young man," she said, "I want to speak to you."

"All right, ma'am," said Dan, surprised.




CHAPTER XII.

A MYSTERIOUS LADY.


Dan thought it probable that the lady who accosted him might wish to
send him on an errand, and his surprise vanished. She was tall, slender,
and grave in appearance. She was probably not over thirty-five. Her
first words renewed Dan's surprise.

"Have you a mother living?"

"Yes, ma'am."

"A father?"

"No, ma'am."

"Are you an only child, or have you brothers and sisters?"

"There is only one of me," answered Dan, humorously.

"I suppose you are poor?"

"If I were not, I would not sell papers for a living."

"Probably you live in a poor place?"

"Yes," answered Dan, beginning to be tired of satisfying what might be
only curiosity on the part of the lady. She noticed at once the change
in his manner.

"I am not making these inquiries out of curiosity," she said, quickly.
"I have an object in what I ask."

This naturally surprised Dan the more.

"All right, ma'am," he said; "I am ready to answer."

"Are you at leisure for an hour or two?" asked the lady.

Dan hesitated.

"I suppose mother will be worried if I don't come home to supper," he
said, hesitating.

"Can't you send her a message not to expect you? Does this little girl
know where you live?"

"Yes," answered Fanny, readily.

To her the lady turned.

"Little girl," she said, "go at once and tell this boy's mother that he
will not be home till nine o'clock. Say he is called away by business."

"Yes, ma'am."

"This will pay you for your trouble."

The little girl's eyes sparkled with joy as the lady placed fifty cents
in her hand.

"Thank you. How glad mother will be!" she said.

As for Dan, he was puzzled to conjecture what the lady could want of
him. What would justify such a handsome compensation to Fanny merely to
explain his absence to his mother?

"Now," said the lady, "if you will hail the next stage we will go up
town."

They had not long to wait. Soon they were rattling over the pavements
through thronged Broadway. It was two years since Dan had been in a
Broadway stage. He could not afford to pay ten cents for a ride, but
when it was absolutely necessary rode in a horse-car for half price.

Dan looked about him to see if he knew any one in the stage. Nearly
opposite sat his former schoolmate, Tom Carver, with a young lady at his
side. Their glances met, and Dan saw Tom's lip curl with scorn. Of
course he did not betray any mark of recognition.

"I like riding in a Broadway stage," he heard the young lady say. "There
is more to see as you go along. Besides, the company is more select."

"Not always," said Tom, with a significant glance at Dan.

Dan felt indignant, but was too proud to show it.

"The price excludes the lower classes from using the stage," said the
young lady.

"It ought to, but I have seen a newsboy in a stage."

"How can they afford to pay ten cents for riding?"

"I give it up," said Tom, shrugging his shoulders.

The lady who was with Dan noticed the direction of Tom Carver's look.

"Do you know that boy?" she asked.

"Yes," answered Dan, "I used to know him."

"Why don't you know him now?"

"Because my father lost his property."

"I see," said the lady. "It is the way of the world. Don't mind it."

"I don't," said Dan, promptly, returning Tom Carver's stare.

Tom could not help hearing this conversation, and learned for the first
time that Dan and the handsomely dressed lady beside him were in
company.

"What can they have to do with each other?" he asked himself, curiously.
"She can't be a relation--she is too handsomely dressed."

At this moment the young lady beside him dropped her handkerchief.
Before Tom could stoop to pick it up Dan had handed it to her with a
polite bow.

"Thank you," said the young lady, with a pleasant smile.

"You needn't have troubled yourself," said Tom Carver, irritated. "This
young lady is under _my_ charge."

"It is no trouble, I assure you," answered Dan.

"He is very polite," said the young lady, in a low voice, "and very
good-looking, too," she added, with a second look at Dan.

"He is only a common newsboy," said Tom, not relishing Julia Grey's
tribute to a boy he disliked.

"I can't help what he is," said the young lady, independently; "he looks
like a gentleman."

Dan could not help catching the drift of their conversation, and his
face flushed with pleasure, for Julia was a very pretty girl, but not
being addressed to him, he could not take notice of it otherwise.

"He lives at the Five Points somewhere," muttered Tom.

The young lady seemed rather amused at Tom's discomposure, and only
smiled in reply.

The stage kept on till it reached Madison square.

"Will you pull the strap opposite the Fifth Avenue Hotel?" said the
lady, addressing Dan.

Dan did so.

He got out first, and helped his companion out.

"Follow me into the hotel," she said.

Dan did so.

"What is your name?" asked the lady, as they ascended the stairs.

"Dan Mordaunt."

"I needn't ask if you have a good mother?" she proceeded.

"One of the best," said Dan, promptly.

"You look like a well-bred boy, and I infer that your mother is a lady.
Come into the parlor. I wish to speak to you on business."

Dan followed her, wondering, and she signed to him to take a seat on the
sofa beside her.

"You have already told me that you have no sister," she began.

"No, ma'am."

"Do you think your mother would enjoy the society of a little girl?"

"I think she would."

"I have a little girl under my charge--my niece--from whom, for reasons
unnecessary to state, I am obliged to part for a time. Do you think your
mother would be willing to take charge of her? Of course I would make it
worth her while."

"I am sure she would like it," said Dan, for he saw at a glance that
this would be a very desirable arrangement for them.

"Then you feel authorized to accept the charge in your mother's name?"

"I do."

"The little girl is five years old. Your mother would be willing to
teach her until such time as she may be old enough to go to school?"

"Oh, yes, ma'am."

"I think little girls are best off at home until the age of seven or
eight."

"There is one objection," said Dan.

"What is that?" asked the lady, quickly.

"We live in a poor room and a poor neighborhood."

"That objection can be obviated. I shall pay you enough to enable you to
take better rooms."

Dan heard this with satisfaction.

"I may as well be explicit," said the lady. "I propose to pay fifty
dollars a month for my ward's board, including, of course, your mothers
care."

"Fifty dollars a month!" repeated Dan, astonished.

"If you consider that sufficient."

"I am afraid it won't be worth it," said Dan, frankly.

"If Althea is well cared for, as I am sure she will be, I shall have no
fear of that. Let me add that I shall allow your mother ten dollars per
month extra for the child's clothing--say sixty dollars in all. For the
present that will probably be enough."

"Oh, yes, I should think so," said Dan. "When do you want her to come to
us?"

"Now. You will take her back with you."

"To-night?" asked Dan, startled.

"Yes, to-night. I must leave New York early to-morrow. In fact, I leave
the city by an early train."

"She would have to come to our poor lodgings," said Dan, hesitatingly.

"One night there won't matter. To-morrow you can secure rooms up town."

"Yes, ma'am, I will. Our month expires to-morrow."

"Now," said the lady, rising, "since the matter is settled, come up
stairs with me, and I will show you the child."

Dan followed the lady up stairs, feeling as if he were in a dream, but a
very pleasant one.




CHAPTER XIII.

ALTHEA.


As the lady entered the room a little girl, with an expression of joy,
ran from the window from which she had been looking, and took her hand.

"I'm so glad you've got home, auntie," she said. "I got tired of being
alone."

"I staid away longer than I intended, Althea," said the lady. "I was
afraid you would feel lonely."

"I was _very_ lonely. I wanted to go out into the hall and play with a
little girl that lives in the next room, but I thought you wouldn't find
me."

"I am glad you did not. I have brought you a playfellow, Althea."

This drew the little girl's attention to Dan. Unlike most girls of her
age, she was not bashful.

"What is his name?" she asked.

"Dan."

"What a funny name! Are you going to live with us, Dan?"

"You are coming to live with me," said Dan, smiling.

"Will you be my brother?"

"Yes."

"And will you play with me?"

"Sometimes."

"I think I shall like you. You are nice-looking," said Althea, in a
matter-of-fact tone.

Dan blushed. He found the compliment agreeable, though it came from a
little girl.

"So are you, Althea," he said.

"I don't think I am," said Althea. "I've black hair, and my skin is
dark. You have nice brown hair, and are whiter than I am."

"Some like dark people best," suggested Dan.

"I don't. I asked auntie to buy me a big cake of soap to wash the brown
off, but it wouldn't come."

Dan smiled. He thought the bright, vivacious little face, with the
brilliant dark eyes, pretty, though Althea did not.

"You will like to live with Dan, my dear?" said her aunt, inquiringly.

"Yes, if you come, too."

"But I can't."

"Why, not, auntie?"

"I have got to go away--on business."

Althea looked disappointed.

"I don't want you to go away, auntie," she said. "Dan and I can't live
alone."

"Dan has a mother, who will be very good to you."

"Will she take care of me?" asked Althea, brightening up.

"Yes, Althea."

"Is she nice?"

"Yes."

"Then she will be my mother?"

"Yes; you can call her mother."

"And you will come to see me some time, auntie?"

"Yes, my dear."

"Then I will go with Dan;" and the little girl placed her hand
confidingly in that of our hero.

Dan thought it would be pleasant for him to have a little sister, and he
knew that it would brighten his mother's existence.

"Shall we go now, madam?" asked Dan, turning to the lady.

"Not just yet. Come here, Dan."

Dan followed her to the window. She drew from her pocket a wallet
containing a considerable sum of money.

"I will hand you two months' payment in advance," she said, "and
afterward I will remit you monthly, or direct you where to call for
money. Two months at fifty dollars will amount to one hundred, and
twenty more for Althea's dress will make it up to a hundred and twenty.
Have you a pocket-book?"

"Yes, ma'am."

"Are you careful of money?"

"Whenever I have any to be careful about," answered Dan.

"I hope you will be comfortably provided from this time. There is a
little trunk of Althea's clothes in the trunk-room below. I will write
you an order for it, but you may as well wait till you have moved before
carrying it away. It will save you trouble."

"Yes, ma'am."

"Have you had any supper?"

"No, ma'am."

"Then you shall go into supper with Althea and myself."

"What! here, at the Fifth Avenue Hotel?" asked Dan.

"Certainly."

"I'm afraid I don't look fit."

"You look well enough. At any rate, it's nobody's business. We may as
well go down now."

There was nothing to say, so Dan followed the mysterious lady into the
supper-room, Althea clinging to his hand. He felt awkward as he took his
seat. Suppose some one should recognize him as the newsboy who usually
stood in front of the Astor House!

Some one did recognize him.

The young lady whom Tom Carver was escorting boarded at the Fifth Avenue
Hotel, and had alighted at the same time with our hero, though he did
not observe it.

Tom had been invited to supper, and, with Julia and her father, was
seated at a neighboring table when Dan entered.

Tom could hardly credit his eyes when he saw Dan entering the
supper-room, with the little girl clinging to his hand.

"Well, I'll be blowed!" he ejaculated, forgetting his manners in his
surprise.

"What did you remark?" asked Julia, rather amused.

"I beg your pardon, but I was so astonished. There is that newsboy
coming into supper!"

"Where?"

"There."

"What a pretty little girl is with him!"

"That's so. Who can she be?"

"You must be mistaken about your friend being a newsboy."

"He is no friend of mine."

"Your acquaintance, then; though he is nice enough looking to be a
friend. Are you sure he is a newsboy?"

"Certain. I saw him selling papers yesterday in front of the Astor
House."

"His business must be good, or he would not board at the Fifth Avenue
Hotel."

"Of whom are you speaking, Julia?" asked her father.

"Of that boy at the next table, pa."

"That boy! Why, that's my young friend of the ferry-boat. Tom, have the
kindness to ask him to come here a moment and speak to me."

Much surprised, and considerably against his will, Tom rose and walked
over to where Dan was sitting.

"Look here," said he; "come over to the next table, will you?"

"What for?" asked Dan.

"There's a gentleman wants to speak to you."

Dan looked over and he recognized Mr. Rogers, of the firm of Barton &
Rogers, who had asked him to call at his place of business on Pearl
street.

"Good-evening, Mr. Rogers," he said, politely.

"Good-evening, my boy. Do you board here?"

"Not as a rule," answered Dan, smiling. "My business don't allow it. I
am dining here with some friends."

"What's your name?"

"Daniel Mordaunt. Everybody calls me Dan."

"Then, Dan, let me make you acquainted with my daughter, Julia."

Dan bowed and smiled.

"I think you were sitting opposite me in the stage, Mr. Mordaunt," said
Julia.

"Yes, Miss Rogers."

"You were polite enough to hand me my handkerchief when I awkwardly
dropped it."

"Oh, don't mention it."

"I hope to meet you again."

"Thank you."

"What a pretty girl she is!" thought Dan.

"Dan, this young gentleman is Thomas Carver. You must be nearly of an
age. You ought to know each other."

"I have known Mr. Carver a long time," said Dan, smiling.

"Indeed!" said Mr. Rogers, surprised.

"We used to sit together at school."

"You didn't tell me that, Tom," said Julia Rogers, turning to Tom.

"No," said Tom, embarrassed; "it is a good while ago."

"I won't detain you any longer from your friends," said Mr. Rogers,
politely. "I shall see you at the office in the morning."

Dan bowed and withdrew.

"Where did you meet him, papa?" asked Julia.

Her father told the story of Dan's exploit on the ferry-boat.

"He is a very smart boy," he said. "I shall probably take him into my
employ."

"I hope you will, papa. He is a very gentlemanly boy."

All this was very disagreeable to Tom Carver, but he did not venture to
say all that he felt, being somewhat in awe of Mr. Rogers.

"They are making a great fuss over a common newsboy," he muttered to
himself.

After supper, Dan prepared to take Althea home with him. She felt so
well acquainted already that she made no objection, but, hand-in-hand,
left the hotel with Dan. He halted a Broadway stage, and they got in.

"Are you carrying me to where you live, Dan?" asked the little girl.

"Yes, Althea."

"Will your mother be glad to see me?"

"Yes, she will be very glad. She wants a little girl to keep her
company."

"Then I'm glad I'm going."




CHAPTER XIV.

A NEW HOME.


Mrs. Mordaunt was apprised by Fanny that Dan had gone up town with a
lady, and therefore was not alarmed when he did not return home at the
usual time. She hoped he would clear fifty cents, but had no idea to
what extent their fortunes would be advanced by Dan's evening's work.

"I will save Dan some supper," she said to herself. "He will be hungry."

So, mother-like, she supped economically herself, on a cup of tea and
some dry bread, and bought a bit of steak for Dan's supper, for she
thought he would be very hungry at so late an hour.

It was nearly half-past eight when she heard Dan's well known step on
the stairs.

She opened the door to welcome him, but the cheerful welcome upon her
lips died away in surprise when she saw his companion.

"Who is this, Dan?" she asked.

"She is going to be my little sister, mother," said Dan, gayly.

"Will you be my mother?" said Althea, releasing Dan's hand, and putting
her own confidingly in that of Mrs. Mordaunt.

"Yes, my dear," said the widow, her heart quite won by the little girl's
innocent confidence, and she bent over and kissed her.

"What does it all mean, Dan?" she asked, in bewilderment.

"It means that Althea is to board with us, and be company for you. I
have agreed with her aunt that you will take her."

"But does her aunt know that we live in such a poor place?" asked his
mother in a tone of hesitation.

"Yes, mother, but that makes no difference, as we shall move up town
to-morrow."

"I am sure you have acted for the best, Dan, but it seems so strange."

"Will it seem strange to receive fifty dollars a month for Althea's
board?" asked Dan.

"Fifty dollars a month!" repeated the widow, incredulously.

"That's the figure, mother. I didn't suppose we ought to charge more."

"More, Dan! Why, it is a fortune!"

"I don't know. That depends on Althea's appetite. Are you a great eater,
Althea?"

"Sometimes I am," said the little girl, naively.

"Never mind, I guess there will be enough."

"I nearly forgot, Dan. You will want some supper. I didn't know there
would be two, but I will go cut and buy some more meat, if you can
wait."

"I have had supper, mother, or dinner rather. I dined with Althea and
her aunt at the Fifth Avenue Hotel."

Here was another surprise.

"Has Althea been stopping there, Dan?"

"Yes, mother."

"Then how can she stay even one night in this poor place?"

"I will ask her. Althea, do you mind stopping here just one night? We
will go to a better place to-morrow."

"No, Dan, I don't care."

"There, mother, I told you so, Althea is a brick."

"What a funny boy you are, Dan! How can I be a brick? A brick is red and
ugly, and I am not."

"No, Althea, you are not ugly, but your cheeks are red."

"They don't look like a brick, Dan."

"No, they don't. I take it all back."

"I had got your supper all ready, Dan," said his mother, regretfully.

"Then eat it yourself, mother."

"I have had my supper."

"You didn't have any meat, I'll warrant. Now, like a good mother, sit
down and eat the steak."

Assured that Dan had supped well, Mrs. Mordaunt didn't resist his
advice.

Dan looked on, and saw with pleasure that his mother relished the meat.

"We will be able to live better hereafter, mother," he said. "There
won't be any stinting. Fifty dollars will go a good ways, and then,
besides, there will be my earnings. I forgot to tell you, mother, that I
have probably got a place."

"Our good fortune is coming all at once, Dan," said Mrs. Mordaunt,
cheerfully.

"So it seems, mother. I think it has come to stay, too."

"I feel so tired," said Althea, at this point. "Can I go to bed?"

"Certainly, my dear child. You can go at once."

In twenty minutes the little girl was in a sound sleep. Dan was not
sorry, for he wanted to tell his mother about the days adventures, and
he could do so more freely without any one to listen.

"So, mother," he concluded, "we are going to turn over a new leaf. We
can't go back to our old style of living just yet, but we can get out of
this tenement-house, and live in a respectable neighborhood."

"God has been good to us, Dan. We ought to feel grateful to Him."

"I know it, mother, but somehow I don't think of that as quick as you.
Who do you think I saw in the supper-room at the Fifth Avenue? Who but
Tom Carver. He was wonderfully puzzled to know how I happened to be
there. He told the party he was with that I was a common newsboy."

"He is a very mean boy," said Mrs. Mordaunt, indignantly. "After being
so intimate with you too."

"Never mind, mother. He can't do me any harm, and I don't care for his
friendship. The time may come when I can meet him on even terms."

"You can now, Dan."

"I mean in a worldly way. I shall work along, and if I get rich I
sha'n't be the first rich man that has risen from the ranks."

"God grant you success, my son!"

Early the next morning Dan started out in search of a new home.

He and his mother decided that they would like to live somewhere near
Union Square, as that would be a pleasant afternoon resort for their
young boarder.

"Will you go with me, mother?" he asked.

"No, Dan, I have not time this morning. Besides you know what will suit
us."

"Very well, mother; I will do my best."

Dan crossed Broadway, and took a horse-car up town.

In West Sixteenth street his attention was drawn to the notice,
"Furnished Rooms to Let," upon a good-looking brick house.

He rang the bell, and asked to see the lady of the house.

A stout, matronly looking woman, with a pleasant face, answered the
servant's call.

"I called to inquire for rooms," said Dan.

"For yourself?" asked Mrs. Brown.

"For my mother, and sister, and myself."

"I have a large back room on the third floor, and a small room on the
fourth floor."

"May I see them?"

"Come up stairs, sir."

First Dan went into the large room.

It was neatly carpeted and furnished, and had a cheerful outlook.

"This will do for mother and Althea," he said.

"Will you look at the little room?"

"Yes, ma'am, but I am sure that will suit. It is for me, and I am not
particular. But there's one thing that may trouble us."

"What is that?"

"Where can mother prepare our meals? She can't cook in the bedroom."

"I will give her the privilege of using my kitchen. I don't care to
take boarders, as it would be too much care, but your mother is welcome
to use my kitchen stove."

"Won't it interfere with you?"

"Leave that to your mother and myself," said Mrs. Brown, with a pleasant
smile. "We can make some satisfactory arrangement."

"How much do you want for your rooms?" asked Dan.

"Will you be permanent?"

"We will be permanent, if suited."

"Of course; that is all I ask. Will four dollars a week suit you?"

"We will pay it," said Dan, quite relieved, for he feared he should have
to pay more. "Can we move in to-day?"

"Any time, sir."

"Thank you."

"I generally ask a week's rent in advance," said Mrs. Brown, "but in
your case I won't insist upon it."

"Oh, it is perfectly convenient," said Dan, and he drew out his
pocket-book containing the money--over a hundred dollars--which Althea's
aunt had given him.

Mrs. Brown's respect for Dan was considerably increased by this display
of wealth, and she congratulated herself on securing such substantial
lodgers.

This business accomplished Dan went down town, and informed his mother
of the arrangement he had made. Before night Mrs. Mordaunt, Althea, and
he were installed in their new home, much to the regret of Mrs.
Rafferty, who regretted losing so good a neighbor. Before this, however,
Dan sought the counting-room of Barton & Rogers.




CHAPTER XV.

DAN BECOMES A DETECTIVE.


Barton & Rogers evidently did business in a large way. They occupied an
imposing-looking building of five stories, the greater part being used
to store goods. Dan entered and looked around him. A spare,
dark-complexioned man of about thirty-five, with a pen behind his ear,
was issuing orders to a couple of workmen.

Dan approached him.

"Is Mr. Rogers in?" he asked.

"No, he is not," said the dark man, curtly.

"Will he be in soon?"

"I don't know."

"You might be more civil," thought our hero.

He stood his ground, feeling authorized to do so because he had come by
appointment.

Observing this, the book-keeper turned and said, sharply:

"Didn't you hear? I said Mr. Rogers was out."

"I heard you," said Dan, quietly.

"Then why do you remain? Do you doubt my word?"

"Not at all, sir; but Mr. Rogers asked me to call this morning. I can
wait."

"You can tell me your business."

"Thank you, but I don't think that would do."

The book-keeper eyed him sharply, and his face lighted up with a sudden
discovery.

"I know you now," he said. "You sell papers in front of the Astor House,
don't you?"

"That has been my business."

"I thought so; I have bought papers of you."

"Thank you for your patronage."

"What can you want of Mr. Rogers?"

"Mr. Rogers wants me, I suppose, or he would not have asked me to call,"
returned Dan.

"You are a cool hand."

"Not always," said Dan, with a smile. "Some hot days I am far from
cool."

"I suppose Mr. Rogers wishes you to supply him with an evening paper?"

"Perhaps he does," returned Dan, with a smile.

"Confound the fellow! I can't make anything of him. When did you see Mr.
Rogers last?"

"In the supper-room of the Fifth Avenue Hotel."

"How happened you to be there?" demanded Talbot, the book-keeper, in
surprise.

"I was taking supper," said Dan, rather enjoying the others surprise,
"and Mr. Rogers saw me from another table."

"Humph! Do you often take supper at the Fifth Avenue Hotel?"

"Not often."

"Selling papers must be very profitable."

"I'm willing to change places with you."

Just then Mr. Rogers entered the warehouse.

"Ah! you are here before me, Dan," he remarked, pleasantly. "Have you
been here long?"

"No, sir; only about five minutes."

"I must keep you waiting a few minutes longer while I look at my
letters. The letters have arrived, have they not, Mr. Talbot?"

"Yes, sir."

"Amuse yourself as you like while you are waiting, Dan," said the
merchant.

Mr. Talbot, the book-keeper, followed the merchant into the
counting-room, and Dan was left alone. He looked about him with
interest, thinking it probable that this was to be his future business
home. It would certainly be a piece of good fortune to become attached
to so large and important a house, and he felt in very good spirits,
though he foresaw that Mr. Talbot would not make it very pleasant for
him. But with his employer on his side he need not be alarmed.

Fifteen minutes passed, and Mr. Rogers emerged from the counting-room.

"I have to go out a few minutes," he said to Dan. "Come with me, and we
can talk on the way."

"Certainly, sir."

Mr. Talbot followed the two with a frown upon his brow.

"How on earth has that boy managed to get round Mr. Rogers?" he asked
himself. "I hope he won't be foolish enough to take him in here."

Talbot had a nephew whom he was anxious to get into the business, and
Dan's engagement would interfere with his little plan. This partly
accounts for his brusque reception of Dan on his first arrival.

"Well, how do you like our place of business, Dan?" asked Mr. Rogers.

"Very much, sir."

"Would you rather sell papers or take employment with me?"

"I should like very much to be in your employ, sir."

"How much did you earn as a newsboy?"

"When I was lucky I made a dollar a day."

"Then I ought to give you six dollars a week."

"I will come for less, sir."

"I will pay you what I said. It is more than boys generally get at the
start, but I am willing to pay a good sum to a boy who suits me."

"I will try to suit you, sir."

"Do you know why I take you into my employ?"

"Out of kindness, sir."

"I feel kindly disposed to you, Dan, but that is not my chief reason."

Dan was puzzled, and waited to hear more.

"My attention was drawn to you on the ferry-boat. I observed your
detection of the mean scamp who cheated a poor flower-girl by offering
her bad money, and I inferred that you were sharp and keen."

"I hope I am, sir."

"That is the sort of boy I want just now. Did you observe Mr. Talbot, my
book-keeper?"

"Yes, sir."

"What did you think of him?"

Dan smiled.

"I don't think he admires me much," he answered. "He wanted to clear me
out before you came in."

"Did he?"

"Yes; he recognized me as a newsboy."

"I understand his reception of you. He has a nephew whom he wishes me to
engage. He is jealous of all possible rivals."

"Perhaps his nephew would suit you better, sir," said Dan, modestly.

"Are you willing to resign in his favor?"

"I prefer to leave that to you, sir."

"You can do so safely. The nephew is a disagreeable boy, who would not
suit me at all. He thinks more of dress than of duty, and, if I read him
aright, is lazy and incompetent. Nevertheless, Mr. Talbot has spoken to
me about taking him."

"Perhaps he doesn't know his nephew's faults."

"He knows them well enough, but is desirous of promoting his interests.
He won't look upon you very favorably when he learns that I have engaged
you."

"If you are satisfied, I won't care for that."

"Well spoken, my lad. And now for a few words in confidence," and Mr.
Rogers lowered his voice. "Our business is a large one, and the sums of
money handled are necessarily large. Three months since I ascertained
that somewhere in my establishment there was a leak. We are losing money
in some unexplained way. I believe that some one in whom I repose
confidence is betraying me."

Dan listened in earnest attention.

"Do you suspect any one, sir?" he asked.

"I suspect Mr. Talbot," he said, in the same low voice.

Dan started in surprise.

"It seems strange, perhaps, that I should speak so confidentially to
you--a mere boy--but I am impressed with the idea that you can help me."

"If I can, sir, I will," said Dan, earnestly.

"I don't doubt it. My first injunction is to say no word, even to your
nearest relations, of what I have told you."

"I won't, sir."

"Next, keep a watch over Mr. Talbot. I want to know what are his habits,
whether he uses money freely, with whom he associates. Can you, without
betraying to him that he is watched, find out some information for me on
these points?"

"I will try, sir."

"If you secure any information, never communicate it to me in the
office. Either come to my house, or write me there."

"Yes, sir."

"You understand that I am employing you in a detective capacity, and
that your time will partly be taken up out of business hours. I intend
to pay you extra, according to results. Is that satisfactory?"

"Perfectly so, Mr. Rogers, but I am afraid you will be disappointed in
me."

"I will take my risk of that."

"Have you any directions to give me, sir, as to how to go to work?"

"No; I am nothing of a detective myself. I leave that to you. I might,
of course, employ a professional detective, but Talbot is sharp, and he
would suspect. You he will not suspect. He won't dream of my employing a
boy. That is all I have to say for the present. When can you come to
work?"

"I can come to-morrow morning. To-day we are going to move."

"To-morrow let it be, then. Good-morning, Dan."

Mr. Rogers shook hands with our hero, and walked away.

"I am afraid I have a hard job on my hands," thought Dan, "but I will do
my best."




CHAPTER XVI.

DAN MAKES A DISCOVERY.


Dan's mother was much pleased with her new quarters. The large room,
occupied by Althea and herself, was bright and cheerful, and well
furnished. Besides the ordinary chamber furniture, there was a
comfortable arm-chair and a lounge. Mrs. Mordaunt felt that she would
not be ashamed now to receive a visit from some of her former friends.

She had anticipated some trouble about the preparation of meals, but
Mrs. Brown made a proposition which wonderfully removed all
difficulties.

"Mrs. Mordaunt," she said, "your family is about the same as mine. I
have a son who is employed in a newspaper office down town, and you have
two young children. Now, suppose we club together, and each pay half of
the table supplies. Then one day you can superintend the cooking--you
will only have to direct my servant Maggie--and the next day I will do
it. Then, every other day, each of us will be a lady of leisure, and not
have to go into the kitchen at all. What do you say?"

"The arrangement will be so much to my advantage that I can say only
one thing--I accept with thanks. But won't you be doing more than your
share? You will be furnishing the fuel, and pay Maggie's wages."

"I should have to do that at any rate. The plan is perfectly
satisfactory to me, if it suits you."

Mrs. Mordaunt found that the expense was not beyond her means. Her
income for the care of Althea was fifty dollars a month, and Dan paid
her four dollars a week out of his wages, reserving the balance as a
fund to purchase clothes. She went herself to market and selected
articles for the table, and, for the first time since her husband's
failure, found herself in easy circumstances.

There was no need now to make vests at starvation prices. She had
thought of continuing, but Dan insisted upon her giving it up entirely.

"If you want to sew, mother," he said, "you can make some of Althea's
clothes, and pay yourself out of the ten dollars a month allowed for her
clothes."

This was sensible and proper, and Mrs. Mordaunt decided to follow Dan's
advice. She lost no time in obtaining books for the little girl, and
commencing her education. Althea knew her letters, but nothing more. She
was bright and eager to learn, and gained rapidly under her new teacher.

Naturally, Dan and his mother were curious as to Althea's early
history, but from the little girl they obtained little information.

"Do you remember your mother, Althea?" asked Dan, one evening.

"Yes," said the little girl.

"When did you see her last?"

"Not long ago. Only a little while before you brought me here."

"Your mother isn't dead, is she?"

"No; but she's gone away."

"Why did she go away?"

"She is sick. That's what auntie told me. Poor mamma cried very much
when she went away. She kissed me, and called me her darling."

"Do you know where she went?"

"No; I don't know."

"Perhaps her lungs are affected, and she has gone to a warmer climate,"
suggested Mrs. Mordaunt. "She may have gone to Florida, or even to
Italy."

"Where is your father?" asked Dan, turning to Althea.

"Father is a bad man," said the child, positively. "He made mamma cry.
He went away a good while ago."

"And didn't he come back?"

"He came back once, and then mamma cried again. I think he wanted mamma
to give him some money."

Dan and his mother talked over the little girl's revelations, and
thought they had obtained a clew to the mystery in which the child's
history was involved. Althea's mother might have married a man of bad
habits, who wanted to get possession of her fortune, and rendered a
separation necessary. Ill health might have required her to leave home
and shift the care of the little girl upon strangers. It seemed rather
odd that she should have been handed over to utter strangers, but there
might have been reasons of which they knew nothing.

"We won't trouble ourselves about it," said Dan. "It's good luck for us,
even if it was bad luck for Althea's mother. I like the idea of having a
little sister."

Althea's last name was not known to her new protector. When Dan
inquired, he was told that she could pass by his name, so Althea
Mordaunt she became.

Both Dan and his mother had feared that she might become homesick, but
the fear seemed groundless. She was of a happy disposition, and almost
immediately began to call Mrs. Mordaunt mother.

"I call you mother," she said, "but I have a mamma besides; but she has
gone away."

"You must not forget your mamma, my dear," said the widow.

"No, I won't. She will come back some day; she said she would."

"And I will take care of you till she does, Althea."

"Yes," said the child, nodding. "I am glad I came to you, for now I have
a brother Dan."

"And I have a little sister," said Dan.

While Dan was away, and now he was away after supper regularly, Althea
was a great deal of company for Mrs. Mordaunt.

In the pleasant afternoons she took the little girl out to walk,
frequently to Union Square Park, where she made acquaintance with other
little girls, and had a merry time, while her new mother sat on one of
the benches.

One day a dark-complexioned gentleman, who had been looking earnestly at
Althea, addressed Mrs. Mordaunt.

"That is a fine little girl of yours, madam," he said.

"Thank you," said Mrs. Mordaunt.

"She does not resemble you much," he said, inquiringly.

"No; there is very little resemblance," answered Mrs. Mordaunt, quietly,
feeling that she must be on her guard.

"Probably she resembles her father?" again essayed the stranger.

Mrs. Mordaunt did not reply, and the stranger thought she was offended.

"I beg your pardon," he said, "but she resembles a friend of mine, and
that called my attention to her."

Mrs. Mordaunt bowed, but thought it wisest not to protract the
conversation. She feared that the inquirer might be a friend of the
father, and hostile to the true interests of the child.

For a week to come she did not again bring Althea to the park, but
walked with her in a different direction. When, after a week, she
returned to the square, the stranger had disappeared. At all events, he
was not to be seen.

We pass now to Dan and his interests.

Mr. Talbot heard of his engagement with anything but satisfaction. He
even ventured to remonstrate with Mr. Rogers.

"Do you know that this boy whom you have engaged is a common newsboy?"
he asked. "I have bought a paper more than once of him, in front of the
Astor House."

"So have I," answered Mr. Rogers, quietly.

"Then you know all about him?"

"Yes."

"It is none of my business, but I think you could easily get a better
boy. There is my nephew----"

"Your nephew would not suit me, Mr. Talbot."

The book-keeper bit his lip.

"Won't you give him a trial?" he asked.

"I have engaged Dan."

"If Dan should prove unsatisfactory, would you try my nephew?"

"Perhaps so."

It was an incautious concession, for it was an inducement to the
book-keeper to get Dan into trouble.

It was Dan's duty to go to the post-office, sometimes to go on errands,
and to make himself generally useful about the warehouses. As we know,
however, he had other duties of a more important character, of which Mr.
Talbot knew nothing.

The first discovery Dan made was made through the book-keeper's
carelessness.

Mr. Rogers was absent in Philadelphia, when Talbot received a note which
evidently disturbed him. Dan saw him knitting his brows, and looking
moody. Finally he hastily wrote a note, and called Dan.

"Take that to -- Wall street," he said, "and don't loiter on the way."

The note was directed to Jones & Robinson.

On reaching the address, Dan found that Jones & Robinson were stock
brokers.

Jones read the note.

"You come from Mr. Talbot?" he asked.

"Yes, sir."

"Tell him we will carry the stocks for him a week longer, but can't
exceed that time."

"Perhaps you had better write him a note," suggested Dan, "as he may not
like to have me know his business."

"Very well."

So Dan carried back the note.

"I believe I have made a discovery," he said to himself. "Mr. Talbot is
speculating in Wall street. I wonder if he speculates with his own money
or the firm's?"

His face, however, betrayed nothing as he handed the note to the
book-keeper, and the latter, after a searching glance, decided that
there was nothing to fear in that quarter.




CHAPTER XVII.

TALBOT'S SECRET.


Some light may be thrown upon Mr. Talbot's operations, if the reader
will accompany him to a brownstone house on Lexington avenue, on the
evening of the day when Dan was sent to the office of the Wall street
brokers.

Mr. Talbot ascended the steps, not with the elastic step of a man with
whom the world is prospering, but with the slow step of a man who is
burdened with care.

"Is Miss Conway at home?" he inquired of the servant who answered the
bell.

"Yes, sir."

"Will you tell her I should like to speak with her?"

"Yes, sir."

Talbot walked in with the air of one who was familiar with the house,
and entering a small front room, took a seat.

The furniture was plain, and the general appearance was that of a
boarding-house.

Talbot seemed immersed in thought, and only raised his eyes from the
carpet when he heard the entrance of a young lady. His face lighted up,
and he rose eagerly.

"My dear Virginia," he said, "it seems a long time since I saw you."

"It is only four days," returned the young lady, coolly.

"Four days without seeing you is an eternity."

The young lady smiled. It was easy to see that Talbot was in love, and
she was not.

"A very pretty compliment," she said. "Well, have you any news?"

"Not good news," said he, soberly.

She shrugged her shoulders, and looked disappointed.

Before going further, it may be as well to describe briefly the young
lady who had so enthralled the book-keeper.

She had the advantage of youth, a complexion clear red and white, and
decidedly pretty features. If there was a defect, it was the expression
of her eyes. There was nothing soft or winning in her glance. She
seemed, and was, of a cold, calculating, unsympathetic nature. She was
intensely selfish, and was resolved only to marry a man who could
gratify her taste for finery and luxurious living.

She was the niece of Mrs. Sinclair, who kept the boarding-house, and
though living in dependence upon her aunt, did nothing to relieve her
from the care and drudgery incidental to her business.

"It's too provoking," she said, pouting.

"So it is, Virginia;" and Talbot tried to take her hand, but she quietly
withdrew it.

"You told me that you would have plenty of money by this time, Mr.
Talbot."

"I expected it, but a man can't foresee the fluctuations of Wall street.
I am afraid I shall meet with a loss."

"I don't believe you are as smart as Sam Eustis--he's engaged to my
cousin. He made ten thousand dollars last month on Lake Shore."

"It's the fools that blunder into luck," said Talbot, irritated.

"Then you'd better turn fool; it seems to pay," said Virginia, rather
sharply.

"No need of that--I'm fool enough already," said Talbot, bitterly.

"Oh, well, if you've only come here to make yourself disagreeable, I'm
sure you'd better stay away," said the young lady, tossing her head.

"I came here expecting sympathy and encouragement," said Talbot.
"Instead, you receive me with taunts and coldness."

"You are unreasonable, Mr. Talbot," said Virginia. "I will be cheerful
and pleasant when you bring me agreeable news."

"Oh, Virginia!" exclaimed Talbot, impulsively. "Why will you require
impossibilities of me? Take me as I am. I have an income of two thousand
dollars a year. We can live comfortably on that, and be happy in a snug
little home."

"Snug little home!" repeated the young lady, scornfully. "Thank you; I'd
rather not. I know just what that means. It means that I am to be a
household drudge, afraid to spend an extra sixpence--perhaps obliged to
take lodgers, like my aunt."

"Not so bad as that, Virginia."

"It would come to that in time."

"I am sure you cannot love me when you so coolly give me up for money."

"I haven't given you up, but I want you to get money."

"Would to Heaven I could!"

"You could if you were in earnest."

"Do you doubt that?"

"Where there's a will, there's a way, Mr. Talbot. If you really care so
much for me, you will try to support me as I want to live."

"Tell me, in a word, what you want."

"Well," said Virginia, slowly, "I want to go to Europe for my
honey-moon. I've heard so much of Paris, I know I should like it ever
so much. Then I want to live _respectably_ when I get back."

"What do you call living respectably?" asked Talbot.

"Well, we must have a nice little house to ourselves, and I think, just
at first, I could get along with three servants; and I should want to go
to the opera, and the theater, and to concerts."

"You have not been accustomed to live in that way, Virginia."

"No; and that's why I have made up my mind not to marry unless my
husband can gratify me."

"Suppose this is impossible?"

"Impossible for you!" said Miss Conway, significantly.

"You mean you will look elsewhere?" said Talbot, hastily.

"Yes, I think so," said Virginia, coolly.

"And you would desert me for a richer suitor?" he demanded, quickly.

"Of course I would rather marry you--you know that," said Virginia, with
perfect self-possession; "but if you can't meet my conditions, perhaps
it is better that we should part."

"You are cruel--heartless!" exclaimed Talbot, angrily.

"No; only sensible," she returned, calmly. "I don't mean to marry you
and be unhappy all my life; and I can't be happy living in the stuffy
way my aunt does. We should both be sorry for such a marriage when it
was too late."

"I will take the risk, Virginia," said Talbot, fixing his eyes with
passionate love on the cold-hearted girl.

"But I will not," said Virginia, decidedly. "I am sure you needn't take
it to heart, Mr. Talbot. Why don't you exert yourself and win a fortune,
as other people do? I am sure plenty of money is made in Wall street."

"And lost."

"Not if you are smart. Come now, smooth your face, and tell me you will
try," she said, coaxingly.

"Yes, Virginia, I will try," he answered, his face clearing. "And if I
try----"

"You will succeed," she said, smiling.

"Well, I hope I may."

"And now don't let us talk about disagreeable things. Do you know, sir,
it is a week since you took me to any place of amusement? And here I
have been moping at home every evening with my aunt, who is terribly
tiresome, poor old soul!"

"I would rather spend the evening here with you, Virginia, than go to
any place of amusement."

"Then I can't agree with you. One gets tired of spooning."

"I don't--if you call by that name being in the company of one you
love."

"You would, if you had as little variety as I have."

"Tell me one thing, Virginia--you love me, don't you?" asked Talbot, in
whose mind sometimes there rose an unpleasant suspicion that his love
was not returned.

"Why, of course I do, you foolish man," she said, carelessly. "And now,
where are you going to take me?"

"Where do you want to go, my darling?"

"To the Italian opera. To-morrow they play 'The Huguenots.'"

"I thought you didn't care for music, Virginia?"

"I don't go for that. I want to go because it's fashionable, and I want
to be seen. So, be a good boy, and get some nice seats for to-morrow
evening."

"Very well, my darling."

"And you'll try to get rich, for my sake?"

"Yes, Virginia. How rich must I be?"

"As soon as you can tell me you have ten thousand dollars, and will
spend half of it on a trip to Europe, I will marry you."

"Is that a bargain?"

"Yes."

"Then I hope to tell you so soon."

"The sooner the better."

When Talbot left the house it was with the determination to secure the
sum required by any means, however objectionable. His great love had
made him reckless.

Virginia Conway followed his retreating form with her cool, calculating
glance.

"Poor man! he is awfully in love!" she said to herself. "I'll give him
two months to raise the money, and if he fails, I think I can captivate
Mr. Cross, though he's horrid."

Mr. Cross was a middle-aged grocer, a widower, without children, and
reputed moderately wealthy.

When Mr. Talbot had entered the house, Dan was not far off. Later, he
saw him at the window with Virginia.

"I suppose that's his young lady," thought Dan. "All right! I guess he's
safe for this evening."




CHAPTER XVIII.

TWO KNIGHTS OF THE HIGHWAY.


Stocks took an upward turn, so that Talbot's brokers were willing to
carry them for him longer without an increase of margin. The market
looked so uncertain, however, that he decided to sell, though he only
made himself whole. To escape loss hardly satisfied him, when it was so
essential to make money.

He was deeply in love with Virginia Conway, but there was no hope of
obtaining her consent to a marriage unless he could raise money enough
to gratify her desires.

How should he do it?

He was returning to his boarding-house at a late hour one night, when,
in an unfrequented street, two figures advanced upon him from the
darkness, and, while one seized him by the throat, the other rifled his
pockets.

Talbot was not a coward, and having only a few dollars in his
pocket-book, while his watch, luckily, was under repair at Tiffany's, he
submitted quietly to the examination.

The pocket-book was opened and its contents eagerly scanned.

An exclamation of disgust mingled with profanity followed.

"Only five dollars, Mike!" muttered one of the ruffians.

"Why don't you carry money, like a gentleman?" demanded the man called
Mike. "Ain't you ashamed to carry such a lean wallet as that there?"

"Really, gentlemen, if I had expected to meet you, I would have provided
myself better," said Talbot, not without a gleam of humor.

"He's chaffing us Bill," said Mike.

"You'd better not, if you know what's best for yourself," growled Bill.
"Where's your ticker?"

"My watch is at Tiffany's."

"That's too thin."

"It's the truth. You ought to have waited till next week, when I'd have
had it for you."

"You're a cool customer."

"Why not?"

"We might hurt you."

"You have already. Don't squeeze my throat so next time."

"Have you any jewelry about you?"

"Only a pair of sleeve buttons."

"Gold?"

"Yes; but they are small, and not worth much."

"You've took us in reg'lar! A gent like you ought to have diamond studs,
or a pin, or something of value."

"I know it, and I'm sorry I haven't, for your sakes."

"No chaffing!" said Bill, with an ominous growl.

"Don't be afraid. I look upon you as gentlemen, and treat you
accordingly. In fact, I'm glad I've met with you."

"Why?" asked Mike, suspiciously.

"I may be able to put something in your way."

"Are you on the square?" asked Bill, rather surprised.

"Yes."

"What is it?"

"I can't tell you in the street. Is there any quiet place, where we
shall not be disturbed or overheard?"

The men looked at each other in doubt.

"This may be a plant," said Mike, suspiciously.

"On my honor, it isn't."

"If it is," growled Bill, "you'd better make your will."

"I know the risk, and am not afraid. In short, I have a job for you."

The men consulted, and finally were led to put confidence in Talbot.

"Is there money in it?" asked Mike.

"Two hundred dollars apiece."

"We'll hear what you have to say. Bill, let's go to your room."

"Is it far away?" asked Talbot.

"No."

"Lead on, then."

The three made their way to a dilapidated building on Houston street,
and ascended to the fourth floor.

Bill kicked open the door of a room with his foot and strode in.

A thin, wretched-looking woman sat in a wooden chair, holding a young
child.

"Is it you, Bill?" she asked.

"Yes, it's me!" growled her husband. "Just clear out into the other
room. Me and these gentlemen have business together."

She meekly obeyed the command of her lord, glancing curiously at Talbot
as she went out. Mike she knew only too well, as one of her husband's
evil companions.

The door was closed, but the wife bent her ear to the keyhole and
listened attentively.

Suspecting nothing, the conspirators spoke in louder tones than they
were aware of, so that she obtained a pretty clear idea of what was
being planned.

"Now go ahead," said Bill, throwing himself on the chair his wife had
vacated. "What's your game?"

"Can you open a safe?" asked Talbot.

"We might, 'specially if we knowed the combination."

"Perhaps I can manage that."

"Where is it?"

Talbot gave the name of his employer and the number of his store.

"What have you got to do with it?"

"I'm the book-keeper."

"You are? What are you going to make out of it?"

"Leave that to me. I'll guarantee that you'll find four hundred dollars
there to pay you for your trouble."

"That isn't enough. The risk is too great."

"It is only one night's work."

"If we're caught, it'll be Sing Sing for seven years."

"That's true. How much do you require, gentlemen?"

The men consulted.

"We might do it for five hundred apiece," said Bill.

There was a little discussion, but finally this was acceded to. Various
details were discussed, and the men separated.

"I'm goin' your way," said Mike. "I'll show you the way out."

"All right, thank you, but we'd better separate at the street door."

"Why? Are you too fine a gentleman to be seen with the likes of me?"
demanded Mike, feeling insulted.

"Not at all, my friend; but if we were seen together by any of the
police, who know me as book-keeper, it would excite suspicion later."

"You're right. Your head's level. You're sure you're on the square?"

"Yes, my friend. I shouldn't dare to tamper with men like you and Bill.
You might find a way to get even with me."

"That's so, stranger. I guess we can trust you."

"You may be sure of that."

"More crime!" said the miserable wife to herself, as she heard through
the keyhole the details of the plan. "Bill is getting worse and worse
every day. Where will it all end?"

"Here, Nancy, get me something to eat," said Bill, when his visitors had
departed.

"Yes, Bill, I will get you all there is."

The wife brought out from a small closet a slice of bread and a segment
of cheese.

"Pah!" said the burly ruffian, turning up his nose. "What are you giving
us?"

"It's all I've got, Bill."

"Where's the meat, I say?"

"There is none."

"You and your brat have eaten it!" said he, irritably.

"God help us, Bill! We have had no meat for a week."

"That's a lie! I can't eat such trash as that. Do you mean to starve
me?"

"I can't make food, Bill. If you will give money, I will provide better.
I can't do anything without money."

"Whining, are you?" said the brute, furiously. "I'll teach you to
complain of me. Take that, and that!" and he struck the woman two brutal
blows with his fist. One, glancing, struck the child, who began to cry.
This further irritated Bill, who, seizing his wife by the shoulders,
thrust her out on the landing.

"There, stay there with the cursed brat!" he growled. "I mean to have
one quiet night."

The wretched wife crept down stairs, and out into the street, scarcely
knowing what she did. She was not wholly destitute of spirit, and
though she might have forgiven personal injury, felt incensed by the
treatment of her innocent child.

"My poor baby!" she said, pitifully, "must you suffer because your
father is a brute? May Heaven avenge our wrongs! Sooner or later it
will."

She sat down on some steps near by; the air was chilly, and she shivered
with the cold, but she tried to shelter her babe as well as she could.
She attracted the attention of a boy who was walking slowly by.

It was Dan, who had at a distance witnessed Talbot's encounter with the
burglars, and his subsequent friendly companionship with them, and was
trying to ascertain the character of the place which he visited.

"What's the matter with you?" asked Dan, in a tone of sympathy.

[Illustration: "What's the matter with you?" asked Dan, in a tone of
sympathy. Page 148]

"My husband has thrust me out of doors with my poor baby."

"He must be a nice husband. Do you want a lodging?"

"I have no money."

"I can let you have enough for that. There's a cheap hotel near by. I'll
take you to it, and pay for your lodging, and pay for it in advance."

"Heaven bless you! You are indeed a friend."

"Take my arm."

Supported by Dan, the poor woman rose and walked to an humble tavern not
far away.

"She may know something about Talbot's visit. I'll question her,"
thought Dan.




CHAPTER XIX.

DAN AS A GOOD SAMARITAN.


"What made your husband treat you so badly?" asked Dan.

"Rum!" answered the woman. "Rum has been sinking him lower and lower,
and it's easy to see the end."

"What will be the end?"

"The prison--perhaps the gallows."

"You are taking too dark a view of your husband," said Dan, soothingly.
"He won't go as far as that."

The woman shook her head.

"I know him only too well," she said. "This very evening he has been
planning a burglary."

Dan started, and a sudden suspicion entered his mind.

"Did you hear him doing it?" he asked.

"Yes."

"Do you know where it is?" he asked, eagerly.

"Yes; it is a store on Pearl street."

Dan felt that he was on the track of a discovery. He was likely to be
repaid at last for the hours he had spent in detective service.

"Who put him up to it?" he asked, fixing his eyes intently on the woman.

"I don't know his name; he is a well-dressed man. I think he is in the
store."

"Was it a man who came to your rooms this evening?"

"Yes."

"Is this the way he looked?" Here Dan gave a rapid description of
Talbot.

"That is the man. Do you know him?"

"Yes, I know him. He is the book-keeper of the firm."

"He is a bad man. He is to pay a thousand dollars for the job. Bill is
to have half of it."

"Bill, I suppose, is your husband?"

"Yes."

Dan looked thoughtful. Here was a most important discovery. He must
consider what to do.

By this time they had reached a small public-house, of humble exterior,
but likely to afford his companion better accommodations than she had at
home.

"Come in," said Dan.

The woman followed him, with the child in her arms. A stout German, who
appeared to be the proprietor of the establishment, was sitting in an
arm-chair, smoking a pipe. He scanned the party phlegmatically.

"What you wants?" he asked.

"Can you give this lady a room?" asked Dan.

"Is she your vife?" asked the German, with a broad grin.

"No; she is an acquaintance of mine. Her husband has driven her out of
his house in a fit of drunkenness. Can she sleep here?"

"Has she got any money?" asked the Dutchman, shrewdly.

"I will pay for her lodging."

"That's all right. She shall stay here."

"What will you charge?"

"Fifty cents a night for the lodging."

"Here it is."

"Will the lady go up now?" asked the landlord, upon whom the silver
half-dollar produced a visible impression.

"Yes," said the woman; "my poor baby is tired."

"You had better stay here two nights," said Dan. "Don't let your husband
know where you are just yet. Here is money to pay for another night's
lodging, and enough to buy food besides."

"God bless you, boy!" she said, gratefully. "But for you I should have
had to stay out all night."

"Oh, no; some one would have taken you in."

"You don't know this neighborhood; the policeman would have found me,
and taken me to the station-house. For myself I care little; but my poor
babe, who is worse than fatherless----" and she burst into tears.

"Keep up your courage, madam. Brighter days may be in store," said Dan,
cheerfully.

"I will come and see you day after to-morrow," said Dan. "Good-night."

Our hero must not be awarded too great credit for his generosity. He
knew that Mr. Rogers would willingly defray all expenses connected with
the discovery, and that the money he had advanced to his unfortunate
companion would be repaid. Had it been otherwise, however, his generous
heart would have prompted him to relieve the woman's suffering.




CHAPTER XX.

LAYING THE TRAIN.


Very early the next morning Dan rang the bell at Mr. Rogers' residence.

"Can I see Mr. Rogers?" he asked.

"The master won't be up for an hour," said the servant.

"Tell him Dan wishes to see him on business of importance."

The girl shrugged her shoulders.

"I don't think he'll see you. He was up late last night," she said.

"Never mind. Let him know I am here."

"It's very important you make yourself," said Susan, crossly.

"I _am_ a person of great importance," said Dan, smiling. "Mr. Rogers
will see me, you'll find."

Two minutes later Susan descended the stairs a little bewildered.

"You're to walk into the parlor," she said. "Master'll be down
directly."

Dan did not have long to wait. Mr. Rogers came down stairs almost
directly in dressing-gown and slippers.

"Well, Dan, what is it?" he asked.

"The store is to be broken open to-night and the safe robbed!" said Dan.

"Good heavens! By whom?"

"By two men living in Houston street--at least, one lives there."

"Have you any more to tell?"

"Yes, sir; they are employed by Mr. Talbot."

Mr. Rogers started.

"Are you sure of this?" he asked.

"Quite sure."

"How did you find out?"

"Partly by accident, sir."

"Go on. Tell me all."

Dan rehearsed the story, already familiar to our readers, combining with
it some further information he had drawn from the woman.

"I didn't think Talbot capable of this," said Mr. Rogers. "He has been
in our employ for ten years. I don't like to think of his treachery,
but, unhappily, there is no reason to doubt it. Now, Dan, what is your
advice?"

"I am afraid my advice wouldn't be worth much, Mr. Rogers," said Dan,
modestly.

"I am not sure of that. I am indebted to you for this important
discovery. You are keen and ready-witted. I won't promise to follow your
advice, but I should like to hear it."

"Then, sir, I will ask you a question. Do you want to prevent the
robbery, or to catch the men in the act?"

"I wish to catch the burglars in the act."

"Then, sir, can you stay away from the store to-day?"

"Why?"

"Your looks might betray your suspicions."

"There is something in that. But how can I take measures to guard
against loss?"

"You can act through me, sir. Is there much money in the safe?"

"No; but Talbot is authorized to sign checks. He will draw money if I am
not at the store."

"Will he place it in the safe?"

"Probably."

"Then let him do so. He is to tell the burglars the combination. He will
get it from the janitor."

"The scoundrel!"

"I will see the janitor, and ask him to give the book-keeper the wrong
word."

"What else?"

"I will secretly notify the police, whom he will admit and hide till the
time comes."

"That is well planned."

"Then," continued Dan, flushing with excitement, "we'll wait till the
burglars come, and let them begin work on the safe. While they are at
work, we will nab them."

"You say we."

"Yes, sir; I want to be there."

"There may be danger."

"I'll risk it, sir."

"Dan, you are a brave boy."

"I don't know about that, sir. But if anything is going on to-night, I
want to be in it."

"You shall, but be prudent. I don't want you to be hurt."

"Thank you, sir. If Mr. Talbot sends me with a large check to the bank,
what shall I do?"

"Take it."

"He may make off with the money during the day."

"I will set another detective to watch him, and have him arrested in
that event."

"This is going to be an exciting day," said Dan to himself, as he set
out for the store.




CHAPTER XXI.

TWELVE THOUSAND DOLLARS.


As Dan entered the store he noticed that Talbot looked excited and
nervous. Ordinarily the book-keeper would have reprimanded him sharply
for his late arrival, but he was not disposed to be strict this morning.

"I'm a little late this morning, Mr. Talbot," said Dan.

"Oh, well, you can be excused for once," said Talbot.

He wished to disarm suspicion by extra good humor. Besides, he intended
to send Dan to the bank presently for a heavy sum, and thought it best
to be on friendly terms with him.

About ten o'clock a messenger entered the store with a note from Mr.
Rogers to the book-keeper. It was to this effect:


     "I am feeling rather out of sorts this morning, and shall not come
     to the store. Should you desire to consult me on any subject, send
     a messenger to my house."


Talbot read this note with great satisfaction. The only obstacle to
carrying out his plans was the apprehended presence and vigilance of his
employer. Now he had a clear field.

About one o'clock he called Dan into the office.

"Here, Dan," he said, "I want you to go to the bank at once."

"Yes, sir."

"Here is a check for twelve thousand dollars--rather a heavy amount--and
you must be very careful not to lose any of it, or to let any one see
that you have so much with you. Do you understand?"

"Yes, sir. In what denominations shall I get the money?"

"You may get one hundred dollars in fives and tens, and the remainder in
large bills."

"All right, sir."

"He means to make a big haul," said Dan to himself, as he left the
store. "I hope our plans won't miscarry. I wouldn't like Mr. Rogers to
lose so large a sum."

As Dan left the store a man of middle size, who was lounging against a
lamp-post, eyed him sharply. As Dan was turning the corner of the street
he left his post, and, walking rapidly, overtook him.

"Where are you going?" he asked.

"What is that to you?" demanded Dan.

"You are in the employ of Barton & Rogers, are you not?"

"Yes, sir."

"Is your name Dan?"

"Yes, sir."

"I am a detective, on watch here by order of Mr. Rogers. Now will you
answer my question?"

"Certainly. I am going to the bank."

"To draw money?"

"Yes, sir."

"How much?"

"Twelve thousand dollars."

"Whew! That is a big sum. Who sent you?"

"Mr. Talbot."

"He is the book-keeper, is he not?"

"Yes, sir."

"I will walk along with you. There is no need of watching till you bring
back the money. Where do you think Talbot will put the money?"

"In the safe, I think, sir."

"I am not sure of that. I believe he will retain the greater part on his
own person. If the men who are to rob the safe got hold of all the money
they would be likely to keep it, and not limit themselves to the sum he
agrees to pay them."

"I suppose you are right, sir. What, then, are we to do?" asked Dan,
perplexed.

"I shall take care to keep Talbot in view. He doesn't propose to run
away. He means to have it understood that all this money has been taken
by the burglars, whereas but a tithe of the sum will be deposited in the
safe."

Dan nodded assent. He was convinced that the detective was right. Still
he was anxious.

"It seems to me there is a risk of losing the money," he said.

The detective smiled.

"Don't be afraid," he said, confidentially. "Talbot won't leave the
city. I will take care of that."

His words inspired confidence, and Dan entered the bank without
misgivings.

The check was so large that the bank officials scrutinized it carefully.
There was no doubt about its being correct, however.

"How will you have it?" was asked.

Dan answered as he had been directed.

"Be very careful, young man," said the disbursing clerk. "You've got too
much to lose."

"All right, sir."

Dan deposited one roll of bills in the left inside pocket of his coat,
and the balance in the right pocket, and then buttoned up the coat.

"I'm a boy of fortune for a short time," he said to himself. "I hope
the time will come when I shall have as much money of my own."

Dan observed that the detective followed him at a little distance, and
it gave him a feeling of security. Some one might have seen the large
sum of money paid him, and instances had been known where boys in such
circumstances had suddenly been set upon in the open street at midday
and robbed. He felt that he had a friend near at hand who would
interfere in such a case.

"What time is it, boy?" asked an ill-looking man, suddenly accosting
him.

"Half-past one."

"Look at your watch."

"I don't carry one," said Dan, eying the questioner suspiciously.

"Nor I. I have been very unfortunate. Can't you give me a quarter to buy
me some dinner?"

"Ask some one else; I'm in a hurry," said Dan, coldly.

The man went away muttering.

"I'm not as green as you take me for," said Dan to himself.

He thought his danger was over, but he was mistaken.

Suddenly a large man, with red hair and beard, emerging from Dan knew
not where, laid his hand on his shoulder.

Dan turned in surprise.

"Boy," said he, in a fierce undertone, "give me that money you have in
your coat-pocket, or I will brain you."

"You forget we are in the public street," said Dan.

"No, I don't."

"You would be arrested."

"And you would be--stunned, perhaps killed!" hissed the man. "Look here,
boy, I am a desperate man. I know how much money you have with you. Give
me half, and go."

Dan looked out of the corner of his eye, to see the detective close at
hand. This gave him courage, for he recognized that the villain was only
speaking the truth, and he did not wish to run any unnecessary risk. He
gave a nod, which brought the detective nearer, and then slipped to one
side, calling:

"Stop thief!"

The ruffian made a dash for him, his face distorted with rage, but his
arm was grasped as by an iron vise.

"Not so fast, Jack Benton!" exclaimed the detective, and he signaled to
a policeman. "You are up to your old tricks again, as I expected."

"Who are you?" demanded Jack, angrily.

"A detective."

"The devil!" ejaculated the foiled burglar. "I have taken nothing," he
added, sullenly.

"That isn't your fault. I heard you threatening the boy, unless he gave
up the money in his possession. Take him away, officer. I will appear
against him."

"Thank you, sir," said Dan, gratefully.

"All right. Go on as quickly as possible. I will keep you in view."

All this took a little time.

Talbot, whose conscience was uneasy, and with good cause, awaited Dan's
arrival very anxiously.

"What made you so long?" he asked.

"A man tried to rob me."

"Did he succeed?" asked Talbot, quickly.

"No; he was recognized by a policeman, who arrested him as he was on the
point of attacking me."

Talbot asked no further questions, considerably to Dan's relief, for he
did not wish to mention the detective if it could be avoided.

The book-keeper contented himself with saying, in a preoccupied tone, as
he received the money:

"You can't be too careful when you have much money about you. I am
almost sorry I sent for this money," he proceeded. "I don't think I
shall need to use it to-day."

"Shall I take it back to the bank, sir?" asked Dan.

"No; I shall put it in the safe over night. I don't care to risk you or
the money again to-day."

"That's a blind," thought Dan. "He won't put it in the safe."




CHAPTER XXII.

TALBOT'S SCHEME FAILS.


Talbot went into the office where he was alone. But the partition walls
were of glass, and Dan managed to put himself in a position where he
could see all that passed within.

The book-keeper opened the package of bills, and divided them into two
parcels. One he replaced in the original paper and labeled it "$12,000."

The other he put into another paper, and put into his own pocket. Dan
saw it all, but could not distinguish the denominations of the bills
assigned to the different packages. He had no doubt, however, that the
smaller bills were placed in the package intended to be deposited in the
safe, so that, though of apparently equal value, it really contained
only about one-tenth of the money drawn from the bank.

Talbot was not conscious of observation. Indeed, he was not observed,
except by Dan, whose business it was to watch him.

The division being made, he opened the safe and placed the package
therein.

"Not quite smart enough, Mr. Talbot," thought Dan. "You will need more
watching."

He was anxious to communicate his discovery to the detective outside,
but for some time had no opportunity.

About an hour later he was sent out on an errand. He looked about him in
a guarded manner till he attracted the attention of the outside
detective. The latter, in answer to a slight nod, approached him
carelessly.

"Well," he asked, "have you any news?"

"Yes," answered Dan. "Mr. Talbot has divided the money into two
packages, and one of them he has put into his own pocket."

"What has he done with the other?"

"Put it into the safe."

"As I expected. He means to appropriate the greater part to his own
use."

"Is there anything more for me to do?" asked Dan.

"I don't know. Keep your eyes open. Does the book-keeper suspect that he
is watched?"

"I am sure that he doesn't."

"That is well."

"I am afraid he will get away with the money," said Dan, anxiously.

"I am not. Do you know whether there's any woman in the case?"

"He visits a young lady on Lexington avenue."

"Do you know the number?"

"No."

"That is important. It is probably on her account that he wishes to
become suddenly rich."

This supposition was a correct one, as we know. It did not, however,
argue unusual shrewdness on the part of the detective, since no motive
is more common in such cases.

Dan returned to the office promptly, and nothing of importance occurred
during the remainder of the day.

When Mr. Talbot was preparing to leave, he called in the janitor.

"You may lock the safe," he said.

"Very well, sir."

"By the way, you may use the word 'Hartford' for the combination."

"Very well, sir."

"Be particularly careful, as the safe contains a package of
money--twelve thousand dollars."

"Wouldn't it have been better to deposit it in the bank, Mr. Talbot?"

"Yes, but it was not till the bank closed that I decided not to use it
to-day. However, it is secure in the safe," he added, carelessly.

"I have no doubt of that, Mr. Talbot."

Mr. Talbot put on his coat and departed.

In turning a street corner, he brushed against a rough-looking man who
was leaning against a lamp-post.

"I beg your pardon," said the book-keeper, politely.

"What did you say?" growled Bill.

"Hartford," said Talbot, in a low tone.

"All right, sir. If you apologize it's all correct."

"They've got the word," said Talbot to himself. "Now the responsibility
rests with them. Now I will go and see Virginia."

His face flushed, and his eyes lighted up with joy, as he uttered her
name. He was deeply in love, and he felt that at last he was in a
position to win the consent of the object of his passion. He knew, or,
rather, he suspected her to be coldly selfish, but he was infatuated. It
was enough that he had fulfilled the conditions imposed upon him. In a
few days he would be on his way to Europe with the lady of his love.
Matters were so arranged that the loss of the twelve thousand dollars
would be credited to the burglars. He would escape suspicion. If his
European journey should excite a shadow of suspicion, nothing could be
proved, and he could represent that he had been lucky in stock
speculations, as even now he intended to represent to Miss Conway.

He was not afraid that she would be deeply shocked by his method of
obtaining money, but he felt that it would be better not to trust her
with a secret, which, if divulged, would compromise his safety.

"Is Miss Conway at home?" he inquired.

Yes, Miss Conway was at home, and she soon entered the room, smiling
upon him inquiringly.

"Well," she said, "have you any news to tell me?"

"Virginia, are you ready to fulfill your promise?" asked Talbot,
eagerly.

"What promise?"

"You know, surely."

"I make so many promises, you know," she said, fencing.

"Your promise to marry me."

"But there were conditions to that."

"Suppose that the conditions are fulfilled, Virginia?"

"Do you really mean so?" she asked, betraying strong interest now. "Have
you been lucky in stocks?"

"I took your advice, Virginia. I dared everything, and I have
succeeded."

"As you might have done before, had you listened to me. How much did you
make?"

"Ten thousand dollars--the amount you required."

The girl's eyes sparkled.

"And you will take me to Europe?" she said. "We will make the grand
tour?"

"As soon as you please."

"Then you deserve a reward."

She stooped and pressed a kiss lightly upon his cheek.

It was a mercenary kiss, but he was so much in love that he felt repaid
for the wrong and wickedness he had done. It would not always be so,
even if he should never be detected, but for the moment he was happy.

"Now let us form our plans," he said. "Will you marry me to-morrow
evening?"

"But that gives me no time."

"You need no time. We will call on a clergyman, quietly, to-morrow
evening, and in fifteen minutes we shall be man and wife. On Saturday a
steamer leaves for Europe. We will start then."

"Oh, that will be nice. I can hardly believe that I shall so soon
realize the dreams of years. I want to go to Paris first."

"Anywhere you please. Your wish shall be my law."

"How can you be spared from your business?" asked Virginia, after a
pause.

"I will plead ill health--anything. There will be no difficulty about
that."

"Shall I tell my aunt?"

"No; not till you are almost ready to start."

"Why not?"

"It is better that there should be no gossip about it. Besides, your
aunt would probably be scandalized by our hasty marriage, and insist
upon delay. That's something we should neither of us be willing to
consent to."

"No, for it would interfere with our European trip."

"You consent, then, to my plans?"

"Yes; I will give you your own way this time," said Virginia, smiling.

"And you will insist on having your own way ever after?"

"Of course," she said; "isn't that right?"

"I am afraid I must consent, at any rate; but, since you are to rule,
you must not be a tyrant, my darling."

Talbot agreed to stay to dinner; indeed, it had been his intention from
the first. He remained till the city clocks struck eleven, and then took
leave of Miss Conway at the door.

He set out for his boarding-place, his mind filled with thoughts of his
coming happiness, when a hand was laid on his arm.

He wheeled suddenly, and his glance fell on a quiet man--the detective.

"What's wanted?" he asked, not dreaming of the truth.

"You must come with me, Mr. Talbot," was the reply. "You are suspected
of robbing the firm that employs you."

"This is absurd nonsense!" exclaimed Talbot, putting on a bold face,
though his heart sank within him.

"I hope so; but you must accompany me, and submit to a search. If my
suspicions are unfounded, I will apologize."

"Hands off, fellow! I believe you intend to rob me. I will give you into
custody."

The detective put a whistle to his mouth, and his summons brought a
policeman.

"Take this man into custody," he said.

"This is an outrage!" exclaimed Talbot; but he was very pale.

"You will be searched at the station-house, Mr. Talbot," said the
detective. "I hope nothing will be found to criminate you. If not, you
shall go free."

Talbot, with a swift motion, drew something from his pocket, and hurled
it into the darkness. But he was observed.

The detective darted after it, and brought it back.

"This is what I wanted," he said. "Policeman, you will bear witness
that it was in Mr. Talbot's possession. I fear we shall have to detain
you a considerable time, sir."

Talbot did not utter a word. Fate had turned against him, and he was
sullen and desperate.

"How did they suspect?" he asked himself; but no answer suggested
itself.




CHAPTER XXIII.

THE CALM BEFORE THE STORM.


In the house on Houston street, Bill wasted little regret on the absence
of his wife and child. Neither did he trouble himself to speculate as to
where she had gone.

"I'm better without her," he said to his confederate, Mike. "She's
always a-whinin' and complainin', Nance is. It makes me sick to see her.
If I speak a rough word to her, and it stands to reason a chap can't
always be soft-spoken, she begins to cry. I like to see a woman have
some spirit, I do."

"They may have too much," said Mike, shrugging his shoulders. "My missus
ain't much like yours. She don't cry, she don't. If I speak rough to
her, she ups with something and flings it at my head. That's her style."

"And what do you do?" asked Bill, in some curiosity.

"Oh, I just leave her to get over it; that's the best way."

"Is it?" said Bill, grimly. "Why, you're not half a man, you ain't. Do
you want to know what I'd do if a woman raised her hand against me?"

"Well, what would you do?"

"I'd beat her till she couldn't see!" said Bill, fiercely; and he looked
as if he was quite capable of it.

"I don't know," said Mike. "You haven't got a wife like mine."

"I just wish I had. I'd tame her."

"She ain't easy to tame."

"Just you take me round there some time, Mike. If she has a tantrum,
turn her over to me."

Mike did not answer. He was not as great a ruffian as Bill, and the
proposal did not strike him favorably.

His wife was certainly a virago, and though strong above the average, he
was her superior in physical strength, but something hindered him from
using it to subdue her. So he was often overmatched by the shrill-voiced
vixen, who knew very well that he would not proceed to extremities. Had
she been Bill's wife, she would have had to yield, or there would have
been bloodshed.

"I say, Bill," said Mike, suddenly, "how much did your wife hear of our
plans last night?"

"Nothing."

"She might."

"If she had she would not dare to say a word," said Bill, carelessly.

"You don't know. Women like to use their tongues."

"She knows I'd kill her if she betrayed me," said Bill. "There ain't no
use considerin' that."

"Well, I'm glad you think so. It would be awkward if the police got wind
of it."

"They won't."

"What do you think of that chap that's puttin' us up to it?"

"I don't like him, but I like his money."

"Five hundred dollars a-piece ain't much for the risk we run."

"We'll have more."

"How?"

"If we don't find more in the safe, we'll bleed him when all's over.
He'll be in our power."

"Well, Bill, you know best. You've got a better head nor me."

"And a stouter heart, man. You're always afeared of something."

It was true that Bill was the leading spirit. He was reckless and
desperate, while Mike was apt to count the cost, and dwell upon the
danger incurred.

They had been associated more than once in unlawful undertakings; and
though both had served a short term of imprisonment, they had in
general escaped scot-free.

It was Bill who hung round the store, and who received from Talbot at
the close of the afternoon the "combination," which was to make the
opening of the safe comparatively easy.

"It's a good thing to have a friend inside," he said to his confederate.
"Our money is as good as made."

"There'll be the janitor to dispose of," suggested Mike.

"Leave him to me. I'll knock him on the head."

"Don't kill him if you can help it, Bill. Murder has an ugly look, and
they'll look out twice as sharp for a murderer as for a burglar.
Besides, swingin' ain't pleasant."

"Never you mind. I'll only stun him a little. He can wake up when we're
gone, but we'll tie him so he can't give the alarm."

"How cool you take things, Bill!"

"Do I? Well, it's my business. You just leave everything to me. Obey
orders, and I'll bring you out all right."

So the day passed, and darkness came on. It was the calm before the
storm.




CHAPTER XXIV.

OLD JACK, THE JANITOR.


The janitor, or watchman, was a sturdy old man, who in early life had
been a sailor. Some accident had made him lame, and this incapacitated
him for his early vocation. It had not, however, impaired his physical
strength, which was very great, and Mr. Rogers was glad to employ him in
his present capacity. Of his fidelity there was no question.

When Jack Green--Jack was the name he generally went by--heard of the
contemplated burglary, he was excited and pleased. It was becoming
rather tame to him to watch night after night without interruption, and
he fancied he should like a little scrimmage. He even wanted to
withstand the burglars single-handed.

"What's the use of callin' in the police?" he urged. "It's only two men,
and old Jack is a match for two."

"You're a strong man, Jack," said Dan, "but one of the burglars is as
strong as you are. I have seen him, you know. He's broad-shouldered and
big-chested."

"I ain't afraid of him," said Jack, defiantly.

"Perhaps not, but there's another man, too. You couldn't overcome both."

"I don't know about that."

But Jack finally yielded, though reluctantly, and three policemen were
admitted about eight o'clock, and carefully secreted, to act when
necessary. Jack pleaded for the privilege of meeting the burglars first,
and the privilege was granted, partly in order that they might be taken
in the act. Old Jack was instructed how to act, and though it was a part
not wholly in accordance with his fearless spirit, he finally agreed to
do as he was told.

It is not necessary to explain how the burglars effected their entrance.
This was effected about twelve o'clock, and by the light of a
dark-lantern Bill and Mike advanced cautiously toward the safe.

At this point old Jack made his appearance, putting on an air of alarm
and dismay.

"Who are you?" he demanded, in a tone which he partially succeeded in
making tremulous.

Bill took up the reply.

"Are you the janitor?" he asked.

"Yes, gentlemen. What do you want?"

"Keep quiet, and we will do you no harm. We want you to open the safe."

"I can't do that, gentlemen. I can't betray my trust."

"All right; I'll do it myself. Give us the key. What's the combination?"

"Hartford."

Bill glanced at Mike significantly. The word agreed with the information
they had received from Talbot. It served to convince them that the
janitor had indeed succumbed, and could be relied upon. There was no
suspicion in the mind of either that there was any one else in the
establishment, and they felt moderately secure from interruption.

"Here, old fellow, hold the lantern while we go to work. Just behave
yourself, and we'll give you ten dollars--shall we, Mike?"

"Yes," answered Mike; "I'm agreed."

"It'll look as if I was helpin' to rob my master," objected Jack.

"Oh, never mind about that; he won't know it. When all is over we'll tie
you up, so that it will look as if you couldn't help yourself. What do
you say?"

Jack felt like making a violent assault upon the man who was offering
him a bribe, but he controlled his impulse, and answered:

"I'm a poor man, and ten dollars will come handy."

"All right," said Bill, convinced by this time that Jack's fidelity was
very cheaply purchased. He plumed himself on his success in converting
the janitor into an ally, and felt that the way was clear before him.

"Mike, give the lantern to this old man, and come here and help me."

Old Jack took the lantern, laughing in his sleeve at the ease with which
he had gulled the burglars, while they kneeled before the safe.

It was then that, looking over his shoulder, he noticed the stealthy
approach of the policemen, accompanied by Dan. He could content himself
no longer. Setting down the lantern, he sprang upon the back of Bill as
he was crouching before him, exclaiming:

"Now, you villain, I have you!"




CHAPTER XXV.

THE BURGLARY.


The attack was so sudden and unexpected that Bill, powerful as he was,
was prostrated, and for an instant interposed no resistance. But this
was not for long.

"You'll repent this, you old idiot!" he hissed between his closed teeth,
and, in spite of old Jack's efforts to keep him down, he forced his way
up.

At the same moment Mike, who had been momentarily dazed by the sudden
attack, seized the janitor, and, between them both, old Jack's life was
likely to be of a very brief tenure. But here the reinforcements
appeared, and changed the aspect of the battle.

One burly policeman seized Bill by the collar, while Mike was taken in
hand by another, and their heavy clubs fell with merciless force on the
heads of the two captives.

In the new surprise Jack found himself a free man, and, holding up the
lantern, cried, exultingly:

"If I am an old idiot, I've got the better of you, you scoundrels!
You'll open the safe, will you?"

Bill looked about him doggedly. It was hard for him to give in, but the
fight was too unequal.

"Mike," said he, "this is a plant. I wish I had that cursed book-keeper
here; he led us into this."

"Is it Mr. Talbot you mean?" asked the janitor.

"Yes," answered Bill; "he put us up to this. Curse him!"

"No need to curse him," said Jack, dryly; "he meant you to succeed."

"Didn't he tell you we were coming to-night?"

"Not he."

"How did you find it out, then?" asked Bill, quickly.

"Not through him. He was watched, for we suspected him. What did he
promise you?"

"Five hundred dollars apiece."

"Was that all?"

"It wasn't enough; but we should have got more out of him."

"Before you go away with your prisoners," said Jack to the policeman, "I
wish to open the safe before you, to see if I am right in my suspicions.
Mr. Talbot drew over ten thousand dollars from the bank to-day, and led
us to think that he deposited it in the safe. I wish to ascertain, in
the presence of witnesses, how much he placed there, and how much he
carried away."

"Go ahead," said the oldest policeman.

The janitor proceeded to open the safe.

"Did we have the right combination?" asked Bill.

"No."

"That cursed book-keeper deceived us, then."

"You are mistaken. He was himself deceived. I gave him the wrong word."

"Curse you, then!" said Bill, savagely.

"Suit yourself, Mr. Burglar," said old Jack, indifferently. "There's an
old saying, 'Curses, like chickens, still come home to roost.' Your
cursing won't hurt me any."

"If my curses don't my fists may!" retorted Bill, with a malignant look.

"You won't have a chance to carry out your threats for some years to
come, if you get your deserts," said Jack, by no means terrified. "I've
only done my duty, and I'm ready to do it again whenever needed."

By this time the safe was open; all present saw the envelope of money
labeled "$12,000."

The two burglars saw the prize which was to have rewarded their efforts
and risk with a tantalizing sense of defeat. They had been so near
success, only to be foiled at last, and consigned to a jail for a term
of years.

"Curse the luck!" muttered Bill, bitterly, and in his heart Mike said
amen.

"Gentlemen, I will count this money before you," said the janitor, as he
opened the parcel.

The count was quickly accomplished. It resulted, as my readers already
know, in the discovery that, in place of twelve thousand, the parcel
contained but one thousand dollars.

"Eleven thousand dollars short!" said Jack. "Gentlemen, will you take
notice of this? Of course it is clear where the rest is gone--Talbot
carried it away with him."

"Where is he?" inquired one of the policemen. "He ought to be pursued."

"By this time he is in custody," said Jack.

"Look here, old man, who engineered this thing?" demanded Bill.

"Come here, Dan," said Jack, summoning our hero, who modestly stood in
the background. "Mr. Burglar, this boy is entitled to the credit of
defeating you. We should have known nothing of your intentions but for
Dan, the Detective."

"He!" said Bill, scornfully. "Why, I could crush him with one hand."

"Force is a good thing, but brains are better," said Jack. "Dan here has
got a better head-piece than any of us."

"You've done yourself credit, boy," said the chief policeman. "When I
have a difficult case I'll send for you."

"You are giving me more credit than I deserve," said Dan, modestly.

"If I ever get out of jail, I'll remember you," said Bill, scowling. "I
wouldn't have minded so much if it had been a man, but to be laid by the
heels by a boy like you--that's enough to make me sick."

"You've said enough, my man," said the policeman who had him in charge.
"Come along, will you?"

The two prisoners, escorted by their captors, made their unwilling way
to the station-house. They were duly tried, and were sentenced to a ten
years' term of imprisonment.

As for Talbot, he tried to have it believed that he took the money found
on him because he distrusted the honesty of the janitor; but this
statement fell to the ground before Dan's testimony and that of Bill's
wife.

He, too, received a heavy sentence, and it was felt that he only got his
just deserts.

       *       *       *       *       *       *       *

On the morning after the events recorded above, Mr. Rogers called Dan
into the counting-room.

"Dan," he said, "I wish to express to you my personal obligations for
the admirable manner in which you have managed the affair of this
burglary."

"Thank you, sir," said Dan.

"I am convinced that but for you I should have lost twelve thousand
dollars. It would not have ruined me, to be sure, but it would have been
a heavy loss."

"Such a loss as that would have ruined me," said Dan, smiling.

"So I should suppose," assented his employer. "I predict, however, that
the time will come when you can stand such a loss, and have something
left."

"I hope so, sir."

"As there must always be a beginning, suppose you begin with that."

Mr. Rogers had turned to his desk and written a check, which he handed
to Dan.

This was the way it read:


     No. 375.

                    PARK NATIONAL BANK.
     Pay to Dan Mordaunt or order One Thousand Dollars.
     ($1,000.)                         BARTON & ROGERS.


Dan took the check, supposing it might be for twenty dollars or so. When
he saw the amount, he started in excitement and incredulity.

"One thousand dollars!" he repeated, in bewilderment.

"Yes," said Mr. Rogers, smiling. "It is a large sum for a boy like you,
Dan. I hope you will invest it wisely."

"But, sir, you don't mean all this for me?" said Dan.

"Indeed I do. It is less than ten per cent on the money you have saved
for us."

"How can I thank you for your kindness, sir?" said Dan, gratefully.

"By continuing to serve us faithfully. By the way, what wages do we pay
you?"

"Six dollars a week."

"It is too little. From this time you will draw ten dollars."

"You have made me rich, Mr. Rogers," said Dan, gratefully.

"It is a little better than selling papers in front of the Astor House,
isn't it, Dan?"

"A good deal, sir."

"I hope you will continue to prosper. Now, Dan, let me give you two
pieces of advice."

"I wish you would, sir."

"First, put this money in a good savings-bank, and don't draw upon it
unless you are obliged to. Let it be a nest-egg."

"I mean to do that, sir."

"And next, spend a part of your earnings in improving your education.
You have already had unusual advantages for a boy of your age, but you
should still be learning. It may help you, in a business point of view,
to understand book-keeping."

"I will learn it, sir."

Dan not only did this, but resumed the study of both French and German,
of which he had some elementary knowledge, and advanced rapidly in all.




CHAPTER XXVI.

DAN LEARNS TO DANCE.


Several months passed without any incidents worth recording.

Punctually every month Dan received a remittance of sixty dollars
through a foreign banker, whose office was near Wall street.

Of this sum it may be remembered that ten dollars were to be
appropriated to Althea's dress.

Of the little girl it may be said she was very happy in her new home.
She formed a strong attachment for Mrs. Mordaunt, whom she called mamma,
while she always looked forward with delight to Dan's return at night.

Mrs. Mordaunt was very happy in the child's companionship, and found the
task of teaching her very congenial.
